
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-43 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-053-ALGERIA 
<H3> <TI>      ALGERIAN ABSTRACTS # 6 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       ALGERIAN ABSTRACTS # 6 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      following summaries highlight information on the security 
situation from articles that appeared in the Algiers and Paris 
French-language press. 

   'Afghan' Smugglers from Maghnia Group on Trial 

   According to EL WATAN of 13 February and LE SOIR D'ALGERIE of 14 
February, the July 1993 arrest of Oumansour Lakhdar has now led to 
the arrest of Bouzi Boumediene and to the dismanteling of the 
Maghnia Group, which operated along the Moroccan- Algerian border, 
in the Sidi Bel-Abbes Wilaya.  In addition to smuggling weapons, the 
group helped 'Afghan' Algerians re-enter the country clandestinely 
and then trained them in subversion and urban guerilla warfare.  The 
newspapers reported that 55 members of the group were charged with 
the formation of an armed terrorist group, possession and sale of 
military weapons and explosives, and attacks on state security.  Of 
those charged, 21 are in custody, 22 are still at large, and 12 are 
out on bail. 

   According to ALGER REPUBLICAIN of 15 February, Maghnia Group 
member Boumediene Bouzi has been sentenced to eight years in prison 
and the forfeiture of his civil rights for five years.  Bouzi was 
charged with assisting the clandestine return of 'Afghan' Algerians 
and using his motorcycle to smuggle weapons, some of which were 
discovered in the Boukanoun mosque along the Algerian-Moroccan 
border near the Moroccan village of Ahfir.  According to LE SOIR, 
investigators found 45 kg of potassium chlorate, 20 sticks of 
gelignite (explosives), and 180 meters of detonator wire in the 
mosque and in a cache near Oued-Kiss.  Lakhdar's arrest also 
reportedly led police to another arms cache near Oued-Kiss 
consisting of two Uzi submachine guns, a Scorpio submachine gun 
(made in Israel) equipped with a silencer, a 6-mm pistol, a 
transmitter, and binoculars.  The ALGER REPUBLICAIN article further 
stated that Mustapha Lahsani, Bachir Laalaj, and Mohamed Lakbir Dadi 
were sentenced to three years in prison, Salah Kheireddine to 18 
months' imprisonment, and Abdelkader Fadal to one year in jail. 
(Fadal had been sentenced to death in an earlier trial in absentia.) 
Ten others were condemned to three years prison without possibility 
of parole, while 18 individuals were acquitted. 

   Security Situation in Blida 

   EL WATAN and LIBERTE of 21 March reported that the "tense" 
situation in Blida was beginning to subside following an "energetic" 
operation by security forces in the region.  According to the 
LIBERTE article, armed Islamists had fostered a climate of fear 
among the town's residents, imposing their own rules of conduct, 
such as mandatory wearing of the hijab and a ban on smoking.  Some 
citizens downplayed these reports, stating that "rumors have been 
blown out of proportion.  Initially people panicked, but today women 
are becoming more confident.  My women colleagues continue to dress 
normally." 

   Both LIBERTE and EL WATAN reported that on 19 March the People's 
National Army moved into Blida.  According to the LIBERTE article, 
"it seemed as though security services in the absence of the 
government had taken things into their own hands."  EL WATAN 
described Blida as completely controlled by police and army: all 
intersections were monitored by the army and all stores were 
officially ordered to close.  According to the EL WATAN article, the 
fact that newspapers have reappeared is an indication that the 
situation has normalized. 

   On 6 April, Paris daily LE MONDE reported the comments of several 
eyewitnesses to events in Blida around 20 March.  According to the 
LE MONDE report, Islamists began imposing orders in December, for 
example, ordering transport companies to separate men and women or 
have their vehicles burned.  One witness recounted that the military 
threatened people over loudspeakers to "denounce Islamists who had 
painted slogans on the walls."  A few nights later, military units, 
nicknamed "the parachutists" arrived in force from bases in Laghouat 
and Biskra.  Another witness added that these soldiers broke down 
doors of those "too afraid to open them."  She added that six young 
people taken from her building by force were found dead the 
following day, some "riddled with bullets," others tortured. 
According to the LE MONDE article, this "major military blow" could 
have been to revenge the death of six officers killed 18 March, or 
to "prepare" for the visit of Interior Minister Selim Saadi to Blida 
on 22 March.  According to a doctor quoted in LE MONDE, "if you call 
people living in Blida they will say nothing.  Citizens think their 
phone lines are tapped.  Officially nothing happened."  (For 
additional reporting, see 94AFO145D "Life in Blida; Citizens Held 
Hostage," in the JPRS Near East/South Asia Report.) 

   New Type of Street Killers 

   EL WATAN of 9 March reported that a new type of "young killer" 
has emerged.  Security services recently arrested high school 
students who are reportedly implicated in "terrorist" acts and who 
belong to armed groups operating in the outskirts of Algiers.  The 
"new breed" of killers are described as "inconspicuous," 
approximately 16 to 22 years old, and generally fashionably dressed. 
In several cases under investigation, the age of the killers is 
rather young.  Asselah Ahmed, head of the fine arts school, and his 
son were killed by two "terrorists' between 15 and 18, according to 
witnesses.  After the killing, the 'terrorists' could not be 
distinguished from other students and were able to enter the school 
and disappear.  In another case, security services arrested high 
school students in Kharchela who had planted a bomb in their own 
schoolyard.  An assassination victim, Vincent Grau, was also 
reportedly killed by a 15 to 18 year old boy. 

(QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6413) 
ENEAG/21 Apr/TACF/TOTF/NEASA Division/JF 21/1324Z APR 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-44 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-016--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-016--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 16, 21 
April 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 

   The EER is published in two editions, one for Western Europe 
(also including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other 
for Eastern Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources 
of these countries but also using other foreign media where 
appropriate, the EER focuses on national and regional economic 
issues, such as economic competitiveness, regional economic 
integration, economic reforms and other changes in economic 
policies, and foreign trade and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   EU 

   Brittan Comments on U.S., Kantor 

   FINLAND 

   Report Proposes Reducing Unemployment Compensation 

   FRANCE 

   Editorial on Labor Minister Giraud Statements; Seguin Denies 
Large Creation of Jobs; Editorial Cautions on Air France Referendum; 
Balladur To Delay Work Hour Decree; Territorial Management Plan Seen 
as Return to 'Dirigisme'; Aid to Government-Owned Companies 
Reviewed; Poll Finds Acceptance for Economic Policy Change 

   GERMANY 

   Country Seen Lagging in Industrial Innovation; German-Turkish 
Economic Ties Expanding; 600,000 More Private Companies in East; 
Most Eastern Steel Plants Privatized, Downsizing; Governments 
Negotiate Post-1994 Job Market Support 

   GREECE 

   Conditions for OTE Sale Detailed 

   PORTUGAL 

   Poll on Government Subsidies 

   SWEDEN 

   Labor Market Measures Seen Replacing Job Creation 

   TURKEY 

   Businessmen View Economic Prospects 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU, Germany, Greece, Portugal, Sweden 

   EU 

   BRITTAN COMMENTS ON U.S., KANTOR--An article in the economic 
supplement of the Paris daily LE FIGARO on 14 April reports an 
interview with Sir Leon Brittan, the EU foreign trade commissioner, 
in which Brittan stated that he believed the United States intends 
to "obey the rules" of the new international agreements even though 
doing so reduces U.S. ability to apply Section 301 trade sanctions. 
Brittan added that for the first time his U.S. counterpart, U.S. 
Trade Representative Mickey Kantor, acknowledged the "constraints" 
on U.S. trade sanctions that the agreements would have when they 
were officially signed in Marrakesh.  Moreover, Brittan states in 
the interview that he has the "deep feeling" that the United States 
is on the defensive, that U.S. conduct is dictated by domestic 
political concerns linked to the agreement's ratification in 
Congress. 

   The article additionally claims that it is "noteworthy" that 
Kantor mistrusts discussions with Brittan, "who always pulled new 
concessions from Kantor."  The article cites Brittan as "smilingly" 
saying, just before meeting with Kantor in a quadrilateral meeting, 
"I am pulling concessions from him gradually." (DiI)  (Paris LE 
FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 14 Apr 94 p I, X) 

   FINLAND 

   REPORT PROPOSES REDUCING UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION--A working 
group commissioned by the government to study reducing the cost of 
Finland's generous social benefits system has proposed cutting the 
duration of unemployment compensation from 500 to 400 workdays. 
This would apply to persons receiving payments based on their 
payroll-deducted contributions to the Unemployment Insurance Fund as 
well as to those receiving only the "basic allowance," which is 
funded completely by the state.  In 1992, the most recent year for 
which figures are available, the average contributions-based benefit 
was 222 markkas/workday and the basic allowance was set at 116 
markkas/workday.  The number of persons receiving the latter type of 
aid is expanding rapidly and is comprised mostly of those who have 
never worked or worked only briefly, especially young people. 

   The working group also proposed introducing a means test for 
eligibility for "labor market aid," a type of state-financed 
assistance equal to the basic allowance and currently paid out 
indefinitely to any worker whose earned or basic benefits have 
expired.  This change would aim at making it more attractive for a 
worker to seek a job or enter a government-sponsored training 
program.  The panel would also like to see an unemployment insurance 
scheme into which all would pay, a sort of universal coverage 
arrangement like the country's national health insurance system. 
(RB)  (Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 30 Mar 94 p 5) 
FRANCE 

   EDITORIAL ON LABOR MINISTER GIRAUD STATEMENTS--According to 
deputy editor-in-chief of LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES Francois Roche, Labor 
Minister Michel Giraud's statement that employment in France will 
improve when the process of implementing the Five-Year Employment 
Law is complete--in the next month and a half--is an uninformed one. 
Roche points out that large companies have reserve capacity which, 
if demand picks up, will allow them to produce more without hiring, 
at least until the end of the year.  Roche adds that it is also 
"illusory" to expect that the law will have "spectacular" effects on 
employment since the law's intent is to manage unemployment rather 
than to treat the underlying causes of it.  The law has a plethora 
of provisions for training workers who do not have work or 
shortening work hours for those who do work, but there is nothing in 
the law to create wealth and encourage business growth.  The 
government has also done nothing about the essential problem of 
protecting our market share through an effective European trade 
policy, to help small- and medium-sized companies through 
appropriate financial strategies, or to implement a progressive 
reindustrialization of France by mentoring new projects, Roche 
concludes. (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 6 Apr 94 p 
40) 

   SEGUIN DENIES LARGE CREATION OF JOBS--In an interview conducted 
by Frederic Gerschel for PARIS MATCH, Philippe Seguin, National 
Assembly president and an influential Rally for the Republic (RPR) 
leader, claimed that measures designed to promote the hiring of 
young people would only create from 10,000 to 15,000 jobs, refuting 
a senior government official's public statement that reducing labor 
costs alone would create 500,000 jobs.  When asked whether his 
estimate was too pessimistic, Seguin replied that "the French must 
be told the truth."  He argued that such labor cost reductions are 
often "marginal" in terms of creating new jobs, for they subsidize 
new hirings that would have taken place regardless of any measures 
adopted.  In Seguin's view, the government's recent effort to 
initiate a Job Training Contract (CIP) failed because young workers 
did not believe training was going to be provided in exchange for 
lower wages.  He added that the withdrawal of the CIP does not 
settle the crisis in the labor market, for contrary to the 
prevailing opinion, unemployment is not limited to the young. 

   Seguin contended that structural reform of the economy is needed, 
so that at least everyone can carry out a useful activity, even if 
full employment cannot be attained.  He advocated that funds now 
used unproductively for unemployment compensation and welfare be 
devoted to job creation.  However, he acknowledged that such a 
momentous" change could only be envisaged within the context of the 
presidential campaign.  Asked by Gerschel whether he feared a 
social explosion," Seguin replied that actually it would be a 
"social implosion," for the "very fabric of society is 
disintegrating" when a fourth of the active population is excluded 
from the labor market. (RM)  (Paris PARIS MATCH in French 14 Apr 94 
p 97-98) 

   EDITORIAL CAUTIONS ON AIR FRANCE REFERENDUM--Francois Roche, 
deputy editor-in-chief for LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, writes that the 
results of the referendum organized by Air France President 
Christian Blanc to determine the level of support among Air France 
employees for his reorganization plans cannot be interpreted as a 
sign that other troubled companies could use the same tactic to 
circumvent labor union disputes.  The referendum at Air France 
garnered a high percentage of participation and the results showed 
that more than 80 percent of the employees would accept Air France's 
restructuring plans despite the fact that only a few of the labor 
unions out of the many which represent Air France workers agreed to 
the plan.  Roche contends that Air France's success in going over 
the heads of the unions to the employees was an "exceptional" case, 
since Air France was a government-owned company, represented the 
nation's flag carrier, had a new president who needed to build 
legitimacy for himself, and took place in such a degraded situation 
that there was little doubt the employees would agree. 

   This said, Roche argues, the strong positive response was 
nonetheless a strong disavowal of Air France unions, one which their 
leadership should think about.  The unions, in opposing so 
strenuously the reorganization plans of former Air France President 
Bernard Attali, unwittingly paved the way for the acceptance of 
Blanc's plan, which is no less hard on the employees.  However, 
Roche notes, many companies understand that the loss of union 
influence is not necessarily good for their labor relations.  He 
points to the German example as one which teaches that sharing 
management with labor is more efficient in periods of economic 
difficulties. 

   Air France's victory may be hard to manage, Roche continues.  In 
his view, the Air France management will need many hours of 
discussion with labor to implement its restructuring plan.  What the 
"will of the people" gave, it can take away, Roche cautions. 
Additionally, the legal foundation for such a course of action has 
not yet been established.  Paradoxically, the referendum sends an 
ambiguous message.  Social dialog in France is in a pitiful state 
when a company boss must win under the Gaullist standard, "Either me 
or chaos." (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 12 Apr 94 p 
40) 

   BALLADUR TO DELAY WORK HOUR DECREE--After backing off from the 
Job Training Contract decree when young job seekers took to the 
streets to protest, Prime Minister Edouard Balladur is again bowing 
to pressure and is delaying a decree intended to give companies more 
flexibility to manage work schedules and to ease unemployment, 
according to an article by Delphine Girard.  She contends that its 
successive flip flops in the conduct of social policy can only 
further weaken Balladur's government.  Although the Labor Ministry 
has been preparing to issue the work hour decree for several months, 
Balladur has decided to make the date of its implementation 
"indefinite" and to submit the issue to professional organizations 
who are charged with negotiating the controversy which has arisen 
over it.  For employers and labor unions which object to it for 
various and contradictory reasons, the government's "retraction" is 
a victory, Girard claims.  Labor Minister Michel Giraud, however, 
who intended to enact the decree by the end of April, is trying to 
justify this new turn of events.  Giraud's staff explains that 
Balladur has chosen to "convince" rather than to "force" social 
partners into accepting a law they do not like, even if doing so 
leads some to believe that he is renouncing labor reform. 

   Those who do not like the work hour decree are many and their 
criticism for its various provisions has been "incessant" and 
"hostile," Girard points out.  The National Confederation of French 
Employers (CNPF) for.example, claims the decree contradicts the 
Five-Year Employment Law since its provision mandating two days of 
rest per week keeps companies from computing work hours on a yearly 
basis.  The labor unions, on the other hand, are complaining that 
the law gives too much flexibility to companies to manage work 
hours, allowing them to stay open six days a week and at night and 
suppresses regulations that require the same work hours for 
everyone.  (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 13 Apr 94 p 
4) 

   TERRITORIAL MANAGEMENT PLAN SEEN AS RETURN TO 'DIRIGISME'--Prime 
Minister Edouard Balladur and his Interior Minister Charles Pasqua 
have presented the outline for their new territorial management 
plan, which according to Christophe Palierese writing in LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES is a plan to return France to "dirigisme" or state 
intervention in the economy.  In presenting the outline, Balladur 
said it was necessary to "stop cutting France in two and to 
strengthen national unity.  Pasqua noted that while it is the 
government's task to create wealth for the nation, it is also its 
obligation to create "fairness."  He said, "We must organize a 
better distribution of men and wealth," adding that "employment is 
at the heart of the debate."  For Balladur as well as for Pasqua, 
territorial management is an economic policy, Palierese explains. 

   Pasqua points out that enormous funds are necessary to accomplish 
this territorial management plan and that the funding will be done 
largely through borrowing, adding that "there is a lot of money in 
this country which is not used in a productive fashion."  Palierese 
further cites Pasqua as saying the intent of the plan is not to 
create a rigid system in France but to "balance" the territory.  He 
added that this will not be done all at once.  Reforming local 
finances will be the first phase.  Below are the parts of the plan 
which are economic in nature: 

   * Reform Local Finances: The plan advocates "clarifying" local 
taxation, which has literally exploded in the last few years and 
which now represents a heavy burden on the taxpayer in an unequal 
manner.  This is especially true for the professional tax, the rate 
for which is lower in areas with many companies and which in turn 
attracts new companies but further disadvantages localities with few 
businesses.  The plan suggests that the professional tax should 
become a tax with a single rate fixed by the government. 

   * Reinforce the Economy: The plan would "support" companies, 
"especially in terms of their capital stock," and envisions 
establishing a "national guarantee fund" for this purpose. 

   * Accelerate Infrastructure Projects: The plan suggests 
transportation funding could be expanded and that "balancing 
mechanisms" could be established to assure that different modes of 
transportation complement each other. (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES in French 14 Apr 94 p 4) 

   AID TO GOVERNMENT-OWNED COMPANIES REVIEWED--An article by Sophie 
Seroussi in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES details the amount of capital the 
French Government has infused into struggling government-owned 
companies during 1993 (see below) and discusses projected government 
aid for 1994.  The greatest beneficiary of this "public manna" is 
the computer company Bull, which received 4.5 billion francs (Fr) in 
1993 and will receive Fr2.5 billion more in 1994.  However, in 1994 
Air France may top Bull if the EU Commission approves the projected 
Fr7 billion government aid planned for the airline's reorganization. 

   Other companies which would like additional funds in 1994 are 
engine manufacturer Snecma, which wants another Fr1 billion, and the 
General Maritime Company (CGM), which wants up to Fr4 billion.  The 
CGM is assured of getting at least Fr5OO million on top of Fr700 
million it received in 1992 (part of which was paid out in 1993). 
The National Railroad Company (SNCF), which will receive Fr36.68 
billion in 1994 from the Transportation Ministry, intends to ask for 
another Fr1.4 billion. 

   In 1994, the Atomic Energy Commission (CEA) and the Sept Arte 
will not be on the list.  However, they will be replaced by the 
National Company for Gun Powder and Explosives (SNPE) and arms 
manufacturer Giat Industries, which will receive subsidies "in one 
fashion or another."  In the audiovisual field, the Communications 
Ministry would like to provide Fr400 million for the television 
station France 2 and Fr300 million for the French Production and 
Audiovisual Company (SFP).  However, Seroussi claims Prime Minister 
Edouard Balladur will have to mediate with the Budget Ministry to 
accomplish further subsidies since paying for them will be difficult 
with only Fr21 billion budgeted for recapitalization.  Seroussi adds 
that the government has "let it be known" on several occasions it 
will finance the recapitalizations with privatizations.  (DiI) 

   Capital Funding for Public Companies (in billions of francs for 
the 1993 Budget) 


   Company                              Amount 

   La Sept-Arte                          .735 
   France Television                     .450 
   SFP                                   .500 
   SNCF                                 1.800 
   CEA                                   .790 
   Bull                                 4.500 
   EMC                                   .500 
   CGPME                                 .500 
   Credit Lyonnais                      3.500 
   Snecma                                .750 
   Aerospatiale                        2.000 
   CGM                                   .500 
   Societe Marseillaise de Credit        .700 

       (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 8 Apr 94 p 10) 



   POLL FINDS ACCEPTANCE FOR ECONOMIC POLICY CHANGE--According to a 
BVA poll conducted by phone at the beginning of March, two thirds of 
the French public agree that to fight unemployment, an alternative 
economic policy to that of Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's is 
possible.  Some 80 percent of the public at large and 97 percent of 
business leaders believed that reducing labor costs for companies 
would relieve unemployment.  The French were also in favor of 
exonerating companies which hire the unemployed from social benefit 
costs--83 percent of the public and 81 percent of business leaders 
approved--but barely a third agreed that lowering the minimum wage 
was acceptable.  Some 77 percent of the public were favorable to 
retiring older workers while 85 percent of business leaders wanted 
to finance public works through borrowing. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION 
in French 18 Apr 94 p 14) 

   GERMANY 
   COUNTRY SEEN LAGGING IN INDUSTRIAL INN0VATION--According to an 
article in FOCUS magazine, Germany is lagging behind the United 
States and Japan in industrial innovation because of an ineffective 
approach to research and a lack of public support.  A study prepared 
exclusively for FOCUS by the Munich-based Institute for Economic 
Research (Ifo) found that in 1990--the last year for which figures 
are available--Germany accounted for 16 percent of all international 
patent applications, compared to 32 percent for the United States, 
and 24 percent for Japan.  As late as 1980, Germany was in second 
place (behind the United States) with 21 percent of all 
applications. 

   Ifo's study also found that a U.S. firm, IBM, was "the most 
innovative company in the world," having made 2,982 patent 
applications between 1989 and 1991.  Although the German firm 
Siemens finished second with 2,885 applications, and five German 
companies finished among the top 20, the article pointed out that 
the German innovations came in industries where the country was 
already strong, like chemicals and automobiles, rather than in new, 
more forward-looking industries.  The article noted, for example, 
that only two German companies placed among the top 40 innovators in 
electronics, the "key technology of the future":  Siemens, in fifth 
place, and Bosch, in 18th. 

   The article blamed Germany's relatively poor showing on both an 
ineffective approach to research and problematic public attitudes. 
Existing procedures, the article asserted, failed to convert the 
"abundantly available" knowledge of basic researchers into practical 
applications.  The country's applied scientists too often failed to 
follow up on breakthroughs made by basic researchers and publicly- 
funded researchers too often worked without regard to the need for 
their work to have some commercial application.  The article also 
noted an aversion to research among the German population, citing as 
examples the transfer of genetic research activities abroad in the 
face of public outcry and opposition by environmentalists to the 
Transrapid magnetic train project.  (RoH)  (Munich FOCUS in German 
28 Mar 94 pp 184-190) 

   GERMAN-TURKISH ECONOMIC TIES EXPANDING--After a record year in 
1993, German-Turkish trade is showing signs of further growth, 
according to an article in the business daily HANDELSBLATT.  Several 
councils have been founded to promote trade and soon there will be a 
German-Turkish Chamber of Commerce in Istanbul.  Thus far, Turkish 
exports to Germany have dominated the trade balance; Germany is 
Turkey's number one trading partner.  Direct Turkish investment in 
Germany has also expanded since the first Turkish banks followed the 
Turkish guest workers into the country.  Now Turkish construction 
companies, textile manufacturers, and retail stores have arrived, 
hoping to use Germany as a base for international trade.  The large 
number of Turkish immigrants to Germany have formed a useful network 
for these businesses.  A businessman from Istanbul explains that 
even a small Turkish businessman can travel in Germany without any 
language problem at all.  He is sure to find help from one of his 
countrymen residing in Germany." 

   Meanwhile, the modernization of Turkey's economy has created 
opportunities for German firms.  Germany has 447 companies operating 
in Turkey--more than any other country.  As a result of Turkey's 
increased need for high-tech equipment, most German investment there 
is in the electronics, machine, chemical, and pharmaceutical 
industries.  Siemens, which has a group of joint ventures, is the 
largest German manufacturer in Turkey.  When asked the most 
important reasons for investing in Turkey, businessmen still cite 
the large market, low wage costs, and proximity to the EU.  With the 
increased attractiveness of Eastern Europe as a low-wage region, 
however, Turkey's role as a bridge to Asia and the former Soviet 
republics is becoming more important.  Auto manufacturer Mercedes- 
Benz views the country as "an ideal production location for 
commercial vehicles for Central Asia."  According to the article, 
Turkish firms can be useful partners for German companies when doing 
business in the CIS countries.  There are already over 5,000 small 
Turkish businesses in the Turkic-speaking republics and Turkish 
construction firms have experience building housing for Russian 
soldiers returning from Germany. (WS)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in 
German 13 Apr 94 pp 21, 23) 

   600,000 MORE PRIVATE COMPANIES IN EAST--The number of businesses 
registered in the new laender increased by about 600,000 during 
1990-93.  The new companies are primarily small and medium-sized 
firms, employing a total of about 3 million persons.  Only about 
11,000 of the new companies are in the industrial sector, which- 
-partly because it requires higher and more complex start-up 
financing--is more difficult to enter than the crafts and trades 
sector.  The Federal Government has adopted a variety of measures to 
stimulate the growth of independent small businesses, including low- 
interest start-up loans; six months of stop-gap funding for persons 
moving from unemployment to entrepreneurship; and special loans to 
stimulate research, development, and innovation in selected high- 
risk economic sectors.  To help some existing small businesses, the 
government is also setting up low-interest loans and credit 
guarantees for worker instruction and on-the-job training.  (CW) 
(Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 8-9 Apr 94 p 7) 

   MOST EASTERN STEEL PLANTS PRIVATIZED, DOWNSIZING--According to a 
report from the Federal Ministry of Economics, privatization of the 
former GDR steel industry is almost finished.  Of the 12 steel 
companies in eastern Germany, the Trust Agency had to shut down only 
two, designating two others for further reorganization prior to 
sale.  Of the eight privatized companies, six have been taken over 
by non-German firms.  The Italian Riva group has bought three 
companies representing 70 percent of eastern Germany's raw steel- 
making capacity, while Italy's Feralpi group, Luxembourg's Arped, 
and the East Slovak Iron Works in Kosice have taken control of one 
company each. 

   The privatized plants are also being thoroughly restructured and 
modernized, while shedding excess productive capacity. 
Collectively, the annual raw steel production capacity of the 
eastern German plants is expected to drop from 8.9 million tons in 
1990 to 5.1 million tons by 1996.  The plants' capacity to produce 
hot-rolled steel is to shrink from 5.35 to 4.25 million tons over 
the same period.  Employment in the plants, which once provided work 
for 66,000 people, is also expected to decline from its current 
level of 10,700 to around 8,000 after 1996. (CW)  (Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 5 Apr 94 p 15) 

   GOVERNMENTS NEGOTIATE POST-1994 JOB MARKET SUPPORT--Post-1994 
funding for public works (ABS) companies in eastern Germany is in 
doubt.  The Trust Agency will provide 3.5 billion German marks (DM) 
in 1994 for such projects employing some 50,000 workers, but this 
funding will end when the Agency is dissolved at the end of the 
year.  The Federal and Laender Governments are negotiating how to 
compensate for this loss but it is expected that funding for 
nonpersonnel costs will be cut from 1994 levels, bringing many ABS 
projects to an end.  A decision on the funding issue is not expected 
before June, however.  (CW)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE 
in German 9 Apr 94 p 9) 

   GREECE 

   CONDITIONS FOR OTE SALE DETAILED--According to an article in the 
Athens weekly TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS, the sale of Greek 
Telecommunications Organization (OTE) shares will implemented under 
the guidelines of a clear price policy to secure the trust of the 
investing public.  The article cites "reliable sources" as stating 
the law on OTE privatization will be approved by next June and will 
include, among other provisions, the organization's definitive price 
policy and an ordinance to allay fears about majority ownership. 
According to the article, this means that when OTE share prices are 
determined, government monitoring of OTE will be ensured.  While the 
government has not yet decided share prices, one scenario under 
discussion is a yearly adjustment of prices to match the expected 
rate of inflation. 

   The privatization law will allow the sale of 25 to 30 percent of 
OTE shares, the article continues.  It is not yet known whether this 
will take place all at once or in successive operations.  While the 
government would like to devote a large share of the privatization 
proceeds to covering the deficit and a smaller part to future OTE 
investment activities, trade unions insist that proceeds be applied 
to the modernization of OTE, characterizing other goals as self- 
defeating.  According to Greek General Confederation of Labor 
President Protopapas, privatization proceeds must be used to fulfill 
modernization needs, OTE must preserve its public and social 
character, and the sale of shares must be both "transparent" and 
subject to worker review.  The article adds that negotiations 
between the government and the trade unions will start as soon as 
possible. (RM)  (Athens TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS in Greek 3 Apr 94 p D7) 

   PORTUGAL 

   POLL ON GOVERNMENT SUBSIDIES--More than 100 businessmen belonging 
to the monthly EXPRESSO/Euroexpansao panel were asked what role the 
state should play in the economy.  Some 59.2 percent said that the 
state must be a partner of the private sector within the context of 
a joint economic modernization policy.  Some 37 percent thought the 
state should play a subsidiary role, in which it monitors the proper 
functioning of the market.  Only 1.9 percent thought the state must 
be one of the principal movers of the economy, preserving an 
important position in strategic sectors such as banking, 
transportation, and telecommunications, as well as in some of the 
large industries.  Some 1.9 percent did not know or did not answer. 
Respondents were evenly divided on the question of whether 
businessmen have depended almost totally on government subsidies and 
EU grants without assuming risks, or not.  Some 11.2 percent did not 
know or did not answer.  (RM)  (Lisbon EXPRESSO ECONOMIA in 
Portuguese 26 Mar 94 p C1) 

   SWEDEN 

   LABOR MARKET MEASURES SEEN REPLACING JOB CREATION--According to a 
series of articles on unemployment in SVENSKA DAGBLADET, the Swedish 
Labor Market Board has become a haven for the unemployed and labor 
market measures designed to create jobs have only contributed to 
long-term unemployment.  Originally intended as a sort of "emergency 
room" for unemployed workers--to take them in, retrain them, and 
find them new jobs--the Swedish Labor Market Board is now becoming a 
long-term care facility.  In 1989, the number of workers who found 
jobs after six months of training was 75 percent but by the first 
half of 1993 the percentages were reversed:  75 percent are now 
returning to the Labor Market Board for more training.  According to 
the board's general director, Gote Bernhardsson, this trend has 
strained his organization's resources.  The board is now handling 
twice as many workers as Bernhardsson said three years ago could be 
accommodated "in a fair manner." 

   Critics note that labor market measures have become too important 
in the job market.  Instead of improving the functioning of the 
labor market and serving as stopgap measures, they are being relied 
upon to "provide alternatives to open unemployment."  Bernhardsson 
criticizes government measures like internships for young workers as 
crowding out real jobs."  Under this program, the government pays 
the wages for a young worker in the private sector for a limited 
time until he is permanently hired by the company.  Companies, 
however, are now looking at this as free labor, according to a 
professor at Umea University.  "Why hire a 25-year-old at full 
wages," the professor asks rhetorically, when you can get a 24 year 
old to do the same work for free?"  (WS)  (Stockholm SVENSKA 
DAGBLADET in Swedish 24 Mar 94 p 34; 25 Mar 94 p C1) 

   TURKEY 

   BUSINESSMEN VIEW ECONOMIC PROSPECTS--In an article in the Ankara 
daily DUNYA, several prominent business leaders discussed Turkey's 
current economic crisis.  Most of these leaders claimed they "were 
not surprised" by it and that, in fact, they "saw it coming."  They 
all stressed the need to lower the deficit.  Their comments are 
summarized below: 

   * Zekeriya Yildirim (former deputy governor of the Central Bank): 
Believes lowering the interest rates created the recent crisis. 
Noted that  the inability of government managers to communicate has 
disillusioned  business confidence.  Advocates government 
downsizing, starting with selling off government-owned companies. 

   * Tevfik Altinok (former undersecretary for Treasury and Foreign 
Trade): Claims the Central bank will never be independent as long as 
the budget deficit continues.  Supports "reasonable" mid-term 
policies to lower the deficit. 

   * Ertugrul Kumcuoglu (high-level government administrator): 
States government must stop foreign borrowing.  Wants the government 
to lower the public debt because without a lower debt, it is 
impossible to stabilize the Turkish currency.  Advocates-reforming 
government bureaucracy and the "structure of government." 

   * Ismet Alver (bank and corporate director): Argues Turkey needs 
a way to stabilize its politics and to implement decisions.   Claims 
frequent elections and changes of government erode the system's 
ability to carry out policies over the long term. 

   * Ishak Alaton (chairman of the Alarka Holding):  Advocates 
providing incentives to get investors back into the market.  States 
many have gotten addicted to earning high profits just by keeping 
their money in the banks, which he characterizes as "very 
dangerous." 

   * Gazi Ercel(bank board member and government administrator): 
Suggests the government must first establish trust in the financial 
markets and then reduce the public debt, which will increase 
production and investment.  Believes that as long as the deficit 
problem continues, the country will continue to go through these 
same crises. (EC)  (Ankara DUNYA in Turkish 21 Feb 94 p 14) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU 

   --EU's future central bank, European Monetary Institute (EMI), to 
be permanently housed in office space in Eurotower building in 
Frankfurt, Germany. . .EMI to continue operating from Basle, 
Switzerland, until after renovation is complete, around beginning of 
November. (LIBERATION in French 6 Apr 94 p 12) 

   Germany 

   --Full conversion of East German marks for West German marks 
achieved on 7 April.  conversion took four years, exchanged 184 
billion East German Ostmarks for Dm120 billion. . .marks completion 
of monetary union between east and west Germany. (Paris LIBERATION 
in French 8 Apr 94 p 14) 

   Greece 

   --Participation in March housing construction  materials fair in 
Canton, China, by 11 Greek companies netted important contracts in 
fast developing Asian market...event to be immediately followed by 
opening of Sino-Greek Chamber of Commerce, Industry in Athens. (TO 
VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS 3 Apr 94 p D15) 

   Portugal 

   --Chamber of Commerce, Industry survey of prospects for first 
half of 1994 indicate 8 percent of businessmen optimistic about 
economy, 45 percent pessimistic, 47 percent expect no change. .91 
percent invested during last half of 1993, only 46 percent plan to 
do so at present. .45 percent reported production, sales decreases 
in 1993, 22 percent expect increase for first half of 1994. (DIARIO 
DE NOTICIAS 29 Mar 94 p 2) 

   --Unanimous EU decision granted grain growers 1 million contos, 
cattle farmers 5 million contos in compensation for 1993 drought 
losses. . .EU Commission has proposed allowing each country in 
future to set own reference year between 1989, 1991 to compute 
payment. (DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 30 Mar 94 p 2) 

   --Total 1993 direct foreign investment fell to 273 million contos 
compared to 1992's 590.6 million contos, according to Athayde 
Marques, president of Investments, Commerce, Tourism of Portugal 
(ICEP). . .second drop in as many years. (DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 28 Mar 
94 p 8) 

   Sweden 

   --Swedish news service study ranks Sweden sixth among OECD 
countries for attracting foreign investment during 1982-91, ahead of 
such EU powers as Germany, France.  undercuts argument that EU 
membership necessary to attract foreign investment. (DAGENS NYHETER 
2 Apr 94 p 30) 

   Roger B. (703-733-6508), Ender C. (703-733-6285), Robert H. (703- 
733-6504), Dian I. (703-733-6286), Rosa M. (703-733-6287), Wendy S. 
(703-733-6506), and Charles W. (703-733-6473) contributed to this 
Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/21 APR 94/ECONF/WED/JF 21/1808Z APR 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-45 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-055--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  TURNOVER IN PARTY, STATE POSITIONS, No 2, 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  TURNOVER IN PARTY, STATE POSITIONS, No 2, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      is the second in a series of listings identifying the 
current and previous positions of high-level Mongolian People's 
Revolutionary Party (MPRP) and government leaders.  Of the 23 
leaders listed, nine hold government positions, including that of 
prime minister.  Five are retired.  A sixth retiree is the president 
of a mass organization.  Three are "rumored" to be employed, two are 
in private business, one is unemployed, and one is living in Russia. 
The current status of one was not indicated. 

   The following list of 23 former Mongolian party and government 
leaders cites their previous positions and their current 
assignments.  (For reporting on 27 other former party and government 
leaders, see FB PN 
94-034.) 

   J. BATMONH -- Previous:  General secretary of the MPRP CC and 
chairman of the Presidium of the People's Great Hural; Current: 
Retired 

   D. SODNOM -- Previous:   MPRP CC Politburo member and chairman of 
the MPR Council of Ministers; Current:  Originally general director 
of the "Gadzryn tos" Company; now adviser to the prime minister 

   B. ALTANGEREL -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and deputy 
chairman of the Council of Ministers; Current:  Retired 

   P. DAMDIN -- Previous:   MPRP CC Politburo member and secretary; 
Current:  Originally deputy director of the Joint Mongolian-Canadian 
"Temuujin mench" Company; "rumored" to have been promoted to the 
petroleum supply department 

   D. MOLOMJAMTS -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and 
secretary; Current:  Retired 

   S. JALAN-AAJAB -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and 
secretary; Current:  (Not indicated) 

   B. DEJID -- Previous:   MPRP CC Politburo member and MPRP CC 
member; former Minister of Public Security; Current:  "Tsatsral" 
Company director 

   B. LAMJAB -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and MPRP CC 
Party Control Committee chairman; Current:  Retired 

   T. RAGCHAA -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and first 
deputy chairman of the Council of Ministers; Current:  Retired 

   S. LUBSANGOMBO -- Previous:  MPRP CC Politburo member and deputy 
chairman of the Council of Ministers; colonel general; former 
minister of public security; Current:  Living in Russia 

   B. LANTUU -- Previous:   MPRP CC Politburo alternate member and 
Ulaanbaatar MPRP Committee chairman; Current:  Government's 
representative at the "Chingis" Hotel project 

   T. BALHAAJAB -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and secretary; Current: 
Retired; "rumored" to be pursuing anthropological research 

   P. JASRAY -- Previous:   MPRP CC Politburo alternate member, 
first deputy chairman of the Council of Ministers and State Planning 
Commission chairman; Current:  Mongolian prime minister 

   C. SUREN -- Previous:   MPRP CC member and deputy chairman of the 
Council of Ministers; Current:  Becoming familiar with business 
world; "rumored" to be owner of a private hotel 

   M. PELJEE -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and deputy chairman of the 
Council of Ministers; Current:  "Erel" Company consultant 

   K. DZARDYHAN -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and deputy chairman of 
the Council of Ministers; Current:  Mongolian consul general in 
Uzbekistan 

   D. BAYMBASUREN -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and deputy chairman 
of the Council of Ministers; Current:  Originally prime minister of 
Mongolia; now president of the Mongolian Fund To Support the 
Development of Mongolia 

   R. BATAA -- Previous:   MPRP CC candidate member and aide to the 
MPRP CC general secretary; Current:  Originally consul general in 
St. Petersburg and adviser to Mongolian president; now unemployed; a 
new position is "rumored" to be in the offing 

   G. CHINGEL -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and director of MPRP CC 
Party Organization Department; Current:  Originally National 
Children's Center director; now worker in the leadership 
coordination department for state administrative organizations of 
the government 

   T. MISHIGDORJ -- Previous: MPRP CC member and MPRP CC department 
chairman; Current:  Mongolian ambassador to Russia 

   C. TUMENDELGER -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and director of the 
MPRP CC Ideology Department; Current:  Mongolian radio, television 
and MONTSAME correspondent in Moscow 

   D. TSAHILGAAN -- Previous:  MPRP CC member and director of the 
MPRP CC Ideology Department; Current:  Mongolian National UNESCO 
Commission chairman 

   B. LIGDEN -- Previous:   MPRP CC member, chief editor of the MPRP 
CC joint periodical editorial board, deputy director of the party 
organization department; Current:  Originally worked as chief editor 
of ARDYN ERH; since retiring has been working as head of the 
administrative department of this newspaper; elected president of 
the Mongolian Union for Peace and and Friendship Organizations 

(Ulaanbaatar UG in Mongolian 20-31 December 1993 pp 4, 5) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/2l APR/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/JF 21/2014Z APR 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-22APR94-PALESTINIANS 
<H3> <TI>      PLO, Fundamentalists Hint At Agreement </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PLO, Fundamentalists Hint At Agreement </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                Recent statements from both mainstream Palestinian sources and 
representatives of Palestinian Islamic fundamentalist 
organizations opposed to the peace process suggest that the PLO 
and at least some fundamentalist groups in the occupied 
territories have reached an understanding on their future 
relations under the proposed Palestinian authority to be 
established according to the Israel-PLO Declaration of Principles 
(DOP).  Both the details of their agreement and how widely 
accepted it will be among fundamentalists remain unclear. 
However, any reported cooperation between the PLO and 
fundamentalist groups associated with terrorism--especially in 
the aftermath of recent Palestinian terrorist attacks against 
Israelis--is bound to heighten Israeli doubts about the PLO's 
willingness and ability to control potential terrorist activities 
once an autonomy regime is in place. 
                         END SUMMARY 

   Mainstream Palestinian sources have all but explicitly 
acknowledged that some sort of PLO-fundamentalist agreement has 
been reached.  For example: 
   --Orient House in Jerusalem, the de facto mainstream Palestinian 
headquarters in the occupied territories, released a statement on 
18 April rejecting Israeli admonitions about reported contacts 
between the PLO and Palestinian fundamentalists.  Israeli 
warnings "relating to coordination between Palestinians who 
support and oppose the peace process," the statement said, "are 
considered Israeli interference in Palestinian internal affairs." 
The statement added that the PLO "has every right to strengthen 
and enhance relations and ties between various sectors of the 
Palestinian people regardless of their political and religious 
affiliations" (Jerusalem Al-Quds, 19 April). 
   --The daily Al-Quds on 18 April cited Dhiyab al-Lawh, identified 
as head of the Fatah media and educational department in Gaza, as 
saying that the relationship between Fatah and Hamas is 
"strategic and crucial."  The paper also quoted al-Lawh as 
dismissing Israeli warnings against PLO-fundamentalist 
coordination, saying that "when we coordinate with Hamas we do 
not take into account what the Israelis say." 
   For their part, fundamentalist sources have been more ambiguous 
and in some instances have even denied the existence of any PLO- 
fundamentalist agreement.  Even the denials, however, have 
implicitly indicated the conclusion of at least an informal 
understanding.  For example: 
   --Al-Quds on 18 April cited Hamas official Mahmud al-Zahhar as 
denying that any agreement had been signed between Fatah and 
Hamas.  Nonetheless, al-Zahhar reportedly added that relations 
between the two organizations are "normal" and that "the meetings 
between the two sides are merely aimed at resolving some 
outstanding problems." 
   --The Jordanian daily Al-Ra'y on 15 April cited a previous 
statement by al-Zahhar calling for a "comprehensive dialogue 
among the Palestinian forces in order to prevent internal 
conflict."  As reported by Al-Ra'y, al-Zahhar denied that 
"coordination between Hamas and the PLO leadership had begun" but 
added cryptically that "some parties to the Oslo agreement" are 
"trying to give the impression through press statements on these 
meetings that there was some sort of political flirtation going 
on between parties that support and parties that oppose the 
present settlement." 
   A further hint of a PLO-fundamentalist understanding came in an 
unusual report by the mainstream PLO radio Voice of Palestine 
(VOP) in Algiers on 14 April.  The report cited a statement by 
Abu-'Abdallah Fa'iz al-'Aswad, identified as a spokesman for the 
Islamic Jihad for the Liberation of Palestine--Al-Aqsa 
battalions, one of several shadowy fundamentalist factions in the 
territories and thus heretofore presumably opposed to the DOP. 
As reported by VOP, al-'Aswad made no reference to an agreement 
with the PLO but adopted current PLO rhetoric on the peace 
process, vehemently denouncing Israel but also implicitly lining 
up behind the DOP.  The statement charged that "Israel's 
prevarication and refusal . . . to withdraw from Gaza and 
Jericho" by 13 April constitutes "a blatant breach and a 
scandalous, open violation of the bases of the DOP."  VOP went on 
to quote al-'Aswad as adding that "the Rabin government will be 
responsible for the developments which will result from the non- 
implementation of the mechanisms of the DOP." 
   What Kind of Agreement? 
   If, indeed, representatives of the PLO and some fundamentalist 
organizations have reached an agreement, they have not given any 
direct account of its content.  Nonetheless, recent statements 
from both sides suggest an arrangement by which fundamentalists 
will refrain from direct challenges to the anticipated 
Palestinian autonomy regime in Gaza and Jericho while the PLO 
will tacitly acquiesce in fundamentalist-inspired violence 
against Israeli targets outside the territorial authority of the 
autonomy regime. 
   Hamas spokesman Ibrahim Ghawshah repudiated Yasir 'Arafat's 
cautious condemnation of recent terrorist attacks against Israeli 
civilians, for which Hamas has claimed credit, but also indicated 
that Hamas might be willing to limit its future anti-Israeli 
operations.  Hamas, he said, believes in the principle of 
"reciprocal treatment," and he specified that if Israel "stops 
killing [Palestinian] women and children . . . Hamas will then 
commit itself to attacking only soldiers and settlers" (London 
Al-Hayah, 14 April). 
   Two items appearing in the 19-25 April issue of Al-Sabil, a new 
Jordanian weekly apparently having close ties to Islamist circles 
in Jordan, went further in implying a willingness by Hamas to 
accept limited cooperation with the PLO and, in principle, an 
eventual Israeli-Palestinian peace accord. 
   --Referring to the current peace process, Musa Abu-Marzuq, head 
of the Hamas political bureau, said in an interview that "part of 
the Palestinian people chose another path for reasons with which 
we differ," but pledged that internal Palestinian disagreements 
"will not affect the Palestinian people's resistance of 
occupation."  Predicting failure for the current Israel-PLO 
negotiations, he vowed that Hamas "will continue its jihad 
[against Israel] but that "we will not transfer the conflict to 
the Palestinian arena and will continue to deal with this 
conflict as sons of the Palestinian people regardless of 
differences of opinion."  Asked about Hamas' attitude toward the 
proposed autonomy regime in Gaza and Jericho, Abu-Marzuq answered 
that Hamas "will certainly not deal . . . positively" with the 
regime and "will not participate in building institutions that do 
not serve the Palestinian people," but he also said that "we will 
. . . continue to be an active element in all areas of life, 
including education, economy, and services, whether inside or 
outside the framework of autonomy." 
   --A statement by the Hamas political bureau lavishly praised 
recent terrorist attacks against Israeli targets and also 
denounced "disgraceful PLO concessions" and the "humiliating 
surrender by the PLO leadership and capitulation to the Zionist 
and American terms."  Nonetheless, the statement also clearly 
implied a willingness in principle to limit future attacks and to 
accept Israeli-Palestinian negotiations.  Recent attacks in 
Israel, the statement said, are not "a constant policy" of Hamas 
but rather "an exception dictated by the enemy government," that 
is, by Israeli attacks against Palestinians.  Hamas, the 
statement went on, "is prepared to reconsider this exception," 
provided that Israel "stops killing unarmed civilians."  The 
statement explicitly rejected the DOP but said that "Hamas is not 
averse to the principle of peace," and specified that a peaceful 
settlement is possible based upon "a full Zionist withdrawal from 
our Palestinian land and the dismantlement and removal of the 
settlements," as well as "free and fair general elections in the 
West Bank and Gaza Strip, in which our people would choose their 
representatives and leaders," a position consistent with current 
declared PLO demands. 
   Predictably, mainstream PLO sources have denied any intention to 
condone terrorism, but at least one recent PLO radio commentary 
raised doubts about the extent of the PLO's commitment. 
   --In an interview with Qol Yisra'el radio, Sufyan Abu-Zayidah, 
identified as a Fatah leader in the Gaza Strip, acknowledged 
"serious differences" between Fatah and Hamas but said that "both 
parties are not interested in a head-on collision between the two 
on the ground."  Anticipating the establishment of the 
Palestinian autonomy regime, Abu-Zayidah said that 
fundamentalists "know they will have to go along with the new 
situation, and discuss their incorporation in it," and vowed that 
Palestinian autonomy authorities will not allow terrorist 
operations to be mounted from within their jurisdiction.  "We 
will have our laws," he said, "and it is clear that Hamas and PLO 
members will be arrested if they violate them."  Specifically, he 
said "there is no cooperation on terror" between mainstream PLO 
leaders and Hamas and he denied that the PLO had agreed to 
continued Hamas attacks inside Israel following the establishment 
of autonomy (17 April). 
   --A commentary broadcast by VOP on 14 April, however, denounced 
the continued presence of Israeli settlements in the occupied 
territories and, without referring explicitly to recent Hamas 
attacks in Israel, said that "the violence that is now continuing 
is natural and will remain so" due to "official Israeli violence" 
and "the violence of the settlers towards the West Bank and the 
Gaza Strip."  VOP added that "nobody supports terrorism" but that 
it is "unacceptable" for Palestinians to "remain subjected to 
terrorism and the experiments of violence and racism carried out 
against them."  It is also "unacceptable," VOP argued, "to expect 
[Palestinians] to remain silent and calm," and the commentary 
asserted that "our people have the right to resist." 
   Background: PLO-Fundamentalist Relations Since the DOP 
   The apparent understanding between the PLO and some 
fundamentalist elements appears to go beyond a previous agreement 
between Fatah and Hamas at the time of the DOP in September 1993, 
in which the two sides reportedly agreed not to engage in violent 
clashes notwithstanding their disagreement over negotiations with 
Israel.  Statements by fundamentalist leaders since that time had 
generally reaffirmed a commitment to avoid intra-Palestinian 
violence but given little indication of any flexibility 
concerning negotiations with Israel or the DOP. 
   --Interviewed by the Tehran daily Jomhuri-Ye Eslami during the 
visit to Iran by a Hamas delegation in late 1993, Abu-Marzuq 
indicated continued refusal to accept the existence of Israel and 
implicitly accused 'Arafat of treason.  "Our struggles will 
continue," he said, "until Palestine is liberated," and he voiced 
hope that the DOP would collapse and "that unity will be achieved 
among all the mujahidin, and that the plan to liberate Palestine 
will materialize."  Referring to 'Arafat, Abu-Marzuq said that 
"someone who implements the enemy's plans is himself an enemy" (4 
December 1993). 
   --Discussing the same visit, Ghawshah said in an interview that 
Iran and Hamas held similar views on "the plot of the Gaza- 
Jericho accord and the plot of peace and normalization which the 
Zionists and the Americans are trying to impose on our nation." 
While reiterating that Hamas "rejected intra-Palestinian 
fighting" and affirming in principle that anti-Israeli violence 
could cease, he did so in a manner that seemed to imply that 
Hamas would accept nothing less than the dissolution of the State 
of Israel.  As an example, Ghawshah said that "if the Jews 
withdraw completely from the Gaza Strip, the intifadah operations 
in the Strip will completely cease," but he added that "jihad 
operations [elsewhere] will not cease because the Jews would then 
continue to exist in other parts of Palestine" (Amman Sawt Al- 
Sha'b, 21 December 1993). 
   For their part, while mainstream PLO sources have occasionally 
referred favorably to fundamentalist factions in the context of 
appeals for Palestinian unity, their general approach to both 
fundamentalist and other rejectionist factions since the DOP had 
been characterized by a mixture of ridicule and exhortations to 
support the mainstream leadership.  For example: 
   --A commentary broadcast by VOP in Yemen on 13 January ridiculed 
rejectionist factions, including Hamas by name, in reference to a 
rejectionist statement condemning the DOP.  Calling the statement 
"ridiculous," "pathetic," "a farce," and "a disaster," VOP said 
that it has "nothing to do with the age in which we are living" 
and that "it is anybody's guess from which wornout, exhausted 
political literature the words of this statement have been dug." 
   --Addressing "opposition factions," including Hamas, a VOP Yemen 
commentary on 25 January said that "by now, the Palestinian 
opposition factions must have realized . . . that the PLO-Israel 
DOP is an established fact."  "Speaking about foiling the 
agreement," the commentary argued, "is no more than talk meant to 
justify avoiding the battle waged by the Palestinian people now 
to establish their national entity."  The Palestinian public, the 
commentary asserted, "wants the [opposition] factions to gear 
their national resistance capabilities toward development by 
adopting a practical approach for action, and not by escape." 
While embracing rejectionists as "part of our national struggle 
and entity," the commentary warned that they should not 
"establish their existence on an illusory island." 
   --On 5 March, Voice of the PLO (VPLO) in Baghdad criticized the 
rejectionist reaction to the Hebron massacre.  Apparently 
alluding in particular to fundamentalist groups by adopting 
Islamic phraseology, VPLO said that "they are vowing three times 
to divorce the peace option" but that "they are solidifying like 
fossils inside [their] slogans."  Such factions, VPLO charged, 
cannot stand the peace option" but "they have no alternative." 
Claiming that "the Palestinian people have never abandoned their 
unity under the PLO banner," the commentary called on "the short- 
sighted ones" to "understand and desist." 
   Israeli Warnings 
   Clearly alarmed by reports of a PLO-Hamas agreement, Israeli 
leaders have warned that any such arrangement that included 
approval of terrorist attacks against Israel would scuttle the 
DOP.  For example, in a speech to the Knesset on 18 April, Prime 
Minister Yitzhaq Rabin said that "any agreement or understanding 
between the PLO and Hamas on continued Hamas terror with the 
PLO's approval will preclude any possibility of agreement between 
Israel and the PLO (Israel TV).  Moreover, while the action may 
not be directly related to the reported agreement, Israeli 
authorities have in the last several days launched a major new 
crackdown against Hamas, including the detention of 362 alleged 
Hamas supporters in the Gaza Strip through 19 April (Qol Yisra'el 
radio, 20 April).  Referring to the operation, Rabin vowed that 
"we will fight those who continue terror with all the means that 
are available to us," subject only to limitations imposed by law 
(Qol Yisra'el radio, 19 April). 
   Implications 
   The apparent agreement between the PLO and some fundamentalist 
elements, even if it holds up, does not mark an end to their 
rivalry, but rather a calculation on the part of both sides as to 
where their respective immediate interests lie as implementation 
of the Gaza-Jericho formula approaches.  For the PLO, the 
arrangement allows the organization to pursue its primary agenda, 
that is, establishing its authority in the territories under the 
DOP, while fending off both Israeli and U.S. pressure to 
categorically renounce terrorism on the one hand and popular 
Palestinian anger over the recent escalation of Israeli- 
Palestinian violence on the other.  For fundamentalists, the 
accord presumably reflects a conclusion that the establishment of 
a PLO-dominated autonomy regime is inevitable and that 
fundamentalists will have to reach a modus vivendi with it or 
risk losing influence among the broader Palestinian public. 
   PLO leaders may regard the continuation of some anti-Israel 
violence outside their immediate territorial jurisdiction as 
working to their advantage, providing they cannot be directly 
linked to it.  Should it be able to maintain order within the 
Gaza-Jericho region, the PLO would doubtless point to the 
contrast between tranquility under its authority and turmoil in 
remaining Israeli-administered areas as evidence supporting its 
demand for full Israeli withdrawal from the territories. 
Moreover, PLO leaders would probably be privately content to see 
militant fundamentalists on the receiving end of harsh Israeli 
countermeasures and therefore unable to oppose the PLO as 
effectively. 
   Were the PLO to openly endorse fundamentalist terror attacks, 
Prime Minister Rabin would probably have no choice but to make 
good on his threat to abandon negotiations.  However, given that 
the PLO is unlikely to renounce its official rejection of 
terrorism, Rabin seems more likely to continue on his current 
course of pursuing negotiations under the DOP while exerting 
maximum pressure on violent rejectionist factions. 
   (AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 22/1835z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-056--SYRIA 
<H3> <TI>      Syrian Media Voice Approval of Attacks on Israelis </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Syrian Media Voice Approval of Attacks on Israelis </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Summary:       Reaction by the state-controlled Syrian media to two 
recent Palestinian terrorist attacks within Israel was largely 
confined to brief but laudatory characterizations of the operations, 
although the government radio's "Palestine Broadcast" program loudly 
applauded the attacks.  Such approval is in keeping with the 
program's frequent celebrations of attacks against Israelis in the 
West Bank and Gaza, as well as its occasional expressions of support 
for such attacks within Israel's 1948 boundaries. 

   Monitored Syrian media have carried no direct comments by Syrian 
officials on the 6 and 13 April suicide attacks on passenger buses 
in 'Afula and Hadera, although 'Abdallah al-Ahmar, assistant 
secretary general of the ruling al-Ba'th party, made a passing 
reference to "the escalating brave Palestinian intifadah against the 
Zionists and their continuous terrorism" in a speech on 17 April 
(Damascus TV, 17 April).  Syrian media, however, characterized the 
attacks alternately as "martyrdom" and "resistance" operations, with 
one headline in the daily Tishrin calling the 'Afula attack "a brave 
offensive" (7 April).  A Damascus radio report the same day 
described the victims of the attack in 'Afula--which is within the 
1948 boundaries of Israel--as "settlers," while a headline in the 
daily Al-Ba'th reported the death of "eight Zionists."   Another 
radio account, referring to Israeli and U.S. appeals to PLO Chairman 
Yasir 'Arafat to condemn the 'Afula attack, reported that a U.S. 
State Department spokesman expressed support for Israel "in its 
fight against so-called terrorism." 

   Stressing that the attacks came in response to the 25 February 
Hebron mosque massacre of Palestinians by an Israeli settler and 
subsequent acts of Israeli government "terrorism," commentaries 
described the suicide operations as evidence of the futility of 
current Israeli policies, including "separate deals"--a clear 
reference to the 13 September 1993 Israeli-PLO Declaration of 
Principles (for example, Tishrin editorial reported by Damascus 
radio, 9 April).  Several commentaries warned that Israel can expect 
more such attacks if it persists in its policies toward the 
Palestinians and the peace process:  A radio commentary on the 8th 
asserted that if the Israelis think they can "achieve peace through 
the continuation of occupation . . . they will undoubtedly reap 
further bitter fruit."  Making the same point more boldly, a 
commentator in Tishrin earlier declared that "he who sows death must 
reap death" (7 April). 

   "Palestine Broadcast" 

   Damascus radio's "Palestine Broadcast"--which purports to speak 
in the name of Palestinians but is fully under Syrian government 
control and makes little attempt to obscure its Syrian character- 
-unreservedly praised the operations.  While repeatedly stressing 
that these attacks occurred in "parts of Palestinian territory 
occupied in 1948" (8 April), commentaries on the program nonetheless 
referred to those killed as "settlers" and stressed that the attacks 
underscored Palestinian determination to rid all of Palestine of 
Israeli occupation: 

--A commentary on the 8th cited approvingly both the 'Afula attack 
and another the same day "on Zionist settlers near Ashdod, also in 
1948 Palestine," declaring that "these are some of the bold and 
heroic operations the intifadah youth carried out against the 
Zionist soldiers and settlers in the Arab territories occupied 
before and after 1967."  The commentary declared that "our 
Palestinian Arab people . . . will chase the Zionists in every spot 
in occupied Palestine." 

--A commentary that followed the attack on the Hadera passenger bus 
was similarly laudatory, celebrating "the spectacular and wondrous 
'Afula and Hadera operations" and claiming that although the Hadera 
attack "was only powerful enough to destroy just one Israeli 
military vehicle" it nonetheless "shook the earth under the decaying 
Zionist ideology" and constituted the punishment "called for by 
divine and temporal laws as well as moral ethics" for the Hebron 
massacre (14 April). 

   In a notable exception to the overall militant tone of the 
Palestine Broadcast commentaries, however, the 14 April commentary 
asserted that "if Israel learns the lesson and ends occupation and 
dismantles settlements and disarms settlers, the road to peace will 
be wide open." 

   The Palestine Broadcast's vocal support for the 'Afula and Hadera 
attacks is consistent with its generally more extreme rhetoric than 
that carried elsewhere in Syrian media.  The Broadcast almost always 
expresses support following attacks against Israelis--whether 
military or civilian, or whether the victims are from the 
settlements or from Israel proper.  While it has generally limited 
its expressions of support in recent years to operations in the West 
Bank and Gaza, the Broadcast has occasionally voiced approval 
following attacks within Israel (for example, 25 November 1992). 

   (Author:  Brown.  Questions and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Near East Analysis Branch at (703) 733-6094) 
ENEAG/22APR94/POLCHF/TOTF/NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH/ta 22/2049z 
apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-48 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT 
IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS 
ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-22APR94-JORDAN 
<H3> <TI>      King Tempers Statement on al-'Aqabah Issue and Peace Process </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       King Tempers Statement on al-'Aqabah Issue and Peace Process </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In an apparent effort to reassure the international community 
that Jordan remains committed to the peace process, King Husayn 
has issued statements that appear to soften an earlier ultimatum 
linking Amman's continued participation in Mideast peace talks to 
a change in the procedure of UN-mandated Multinational 
Interdiction Force (MIF) inspections of ship cargo bound for the 
Port of al-'Aqabah, which Jordanian media characterize as a 
severe hardship for Jordan's economy.  Although the King's recent 
remarks make it clear that Amman wants to remain a full 
participant in the peace process, the government may find it 
difficult to justify its participation amid increasing anti-U.S. 
sentiment unless progress on the al-'Aqabah issue is forthcoming. 

                       END SUMMARY 

   Recent statements by King Husayn have signaled Amman's continued 
commitment to the peace process and its conviction that a 
solution to the al-'Aqabah issue is imminent.  Addressing a news 
conference during the visit of Austrian President Klestil, the 
king characterized the present mode of al-'Aqabah inspections as 
"totally intolerable," but added that the government had "an 
indication that the problem is being addressed, and we hope that 
we will have a positive response soon" (Jordan Television, 16 
April).  More recently, Husayn took pains to emphasize Amman's 
role in the peace process, stating that "we in Jordan have 
reiterated our position in terms of our readiness and 
determination to work seriously to implement the provisions of 
the agenda . . . approved after the signing of the Palestinian- 
Israeli agreement in Washington" (Jordan Television, 16 April). 
Echoing the king's conciliatory tone, House of Representatives 
speaker Tahir al-Masri stated that there are "clear and strong 
signs" that a resolution of the al-'Aqabah issue is at hand.  He 
reiterated Jordan's "strategic" interest in the peace process, 
adding that a resolution of the al-'Aqabah issue would "reflect 
positively on Jordan's stand toward the peace process" (Paris 
Radio Monte Carlo, 15 April). 
   The statements mark a departure from the king's strong statement 
to the five ambassadors of the UN Security Council permanent 
members on 28 March asserting that the resumption of talks with 
Israel was contingent on resolving the "completely unacceptable 
situation" in al-'Aqabah, which constitutes a "direct affront to 
Jordan's dignity" (Jordan Times 29 March).  The king's statement 
came amid the backdrop of a flood of articles in Jordan's semi- 
independent press criticizing the slow progress in reaching an 
accommodation with Washington on changing the mode of the MIF 
inspections. 

   Media Protest Escalation of al-'Aqabah Searches 

   Although Jordanian media have long criticized the MIF inspections 
of ships bound for al-'Aqabah port as an economically burdensome 
by-product of the UN sanctions against Iraq, the issue has taken 
on a highly politicized dimension in recent months and has 
dominated press editorials as a result of a perception that the 
stepped-up MIF searches constitute U.S. pressure on Amman to sign 
a peace agreement with Israel.  In February, Jordanian media 
began noting a substantial increase in the frequency of MIF 
interceptions of Jordan-bound ships (See Note 1), and press 
articles viewed the phenomenon as "harassment" and U.S. arm- 
twisting to force Jordan to sign a unilateral peace treaty with 
Israel and initiate an end to the Arab boycott of Israel (Al- 
Ra'y, 1 February). 
   (Note 1) A Jordan Times report noted that a ship held for 
inspection at the Straits of Tiran on 17 April was the 13th 
vessel intercepted by the MIF this year, compared to a total of 
20 for all of 1993.  The report concluded that since none of the 
more than 1,700 ships inspected since the inception of the 
process had been found to be carrying cargo in contravention of 
the Iraq sanctions, the inspection regime is a "deliberate 
harassment aimed at pressuring the Kingdom to make sweeping, 
illogical concessions to Israel in the peace talks" (19 April). 
   At the same time, some Amman papers were reporting that the U.S. 
appeared receptive to a proposed land-based procedure for the al- 
'Aqabah inspections that would ease the economic cost to Jordan, 
and expressed optimism that the U.S. would act swiftly on the 
issue.  Al-Dustur cited the spokesman for the Jordanian 
delegation to the talks with Israel, Marwan al-Mu'ashshir, as 
saying that during the king's January visit to Washington, the 
U.S. Administration had "welcomed the idea of replacing sea 
searches by an international on-land inspection of the goods 
bound for Jordan through the Gulf of Aqaba."  Al-Mu'ashshir even 
hinted at a possible quid pro quo by Amman, noting that while a 
final decision on the Arab boycott issue rested with the Arab 
League, "the secondary and tertiary boycott can be studied, and 
ways can be worked out to deal with this matter" (1 February). 
   In the wake of a subsequent lack of movement on the al-'Aqabah 
issue, coupled with the mid-March UN Security Council renewal of 
the economic embargo against Iraq, press editorials stepped up 
their anti-U.S. rhetoric (Jordan Times 22 March, Al-Ra'y 21 
March), and government resolve to deal decisively with the matter 
crystallized.  Only hours before the arrival of U.S. special 
envoy Dennis Ross in Amman, the Jordanian House of 
Representatives issued a statement calling on the government to 
suspend its role in the peace process "until the U.S.-led 
blockade on the Red Sea port of al-'Aqabah is actually lifted" 
(Jordan Times, 23 March).  The highly charged atmosphere 
surrounding the Ross visit was reflected in the press, which 
noted coolly that while Ross said Washington would "study" 
Jordanian proposals to change the MIF procedures, he "refused to 
make any promises that these pressures would be lifted" (Akhbar 
al-Usbu', 24 March). 

   Government Signals Displeasure 

   In further indications of Jordanian displeasure with the slow 
progress of negotiations on al-'Aqabah, the government chose to 
cancel a high-level trip to Washington and lowered its level of 
representation at various multilateral peace talks committee 
meetings.  However, Jordan's decision to downgrade its 
representatives at multilateral meetings--rather than boycott the 
sessions altogether--signaled its reluctance to risk serious 
disruption of the peace negotiations. 
   --In place of an official delegation, Amman sent an observer to 
the 7 April multilateral talks on environmental issues "because 
we are still awaiting Washington's decision on the Port of al- 
'Aqabah blockade," according to Foreign Ministry officials cited 
by Al-Ra'y (7 April). 
   --Similarly, Jordan reduced its level of representation at the 
Oman multilateral talks on water rights to observer status (Al- 
Dustur, 17 April); in the previous four sessions of the water 
committee, Amman had participated with a six-member official 
delegation  (Amman Radio, 19 April). 
   --Crown Prince Hasan reportedly canceled a visit to Washington 
scheduled for 20 April "following the U.S.-Jordanian tension 
resulting from the al-'Aqabah Port blockade"  (Al-Majd, 18 
April). 
   --Amman declined to host a regional conference on economic 
investment slated for 1O April that was to have included an 
Israeli delegation (Al-Majd, 18 April). 

   Student Protest Underscores Domestic Discord 

   Reflecting one facet of the domestic pressures the government 
faces on the issues of al-'Aqabah and the peace process from an 
increasingly vocal press and public, the Jordan Times reported a 
demonstration of between 500 and 1,000 University of Jordan 
students against the al-'Aqabah inspections, noting that the 
fundamentalist-oriented "Islamic bloc" dominated the event.  The 
newspaper reported that the students called on the government to 
"withdraw from the peace process altogether" (21-22 April).  They 
also "set fire to U.S. and Israeli flags," and "raised posters 
supporting His Majesty King Husayn's pan-Arab policies and 
condemning Washington's arrogant policy," according to Akhbar al- 
Usbu' (21 April). 

   Implications 

   The recent escalation in the number of al-'Aqabah inspections- 
-and the accompanying public and press perception of the MIF 
searches as being a form of U.S. political pressure--have posed 
considerable challenges to the government's stated intent to 
continue its active role in the peace process.  A modified 
arrangement at al-'Aqabah that would ease the strain on the 
domestic economy is clearly what Amman is seeking.  Such an 
accommodation would likely go a long way toward easing internal 
pressures on the government and permitting further progress on 
both bilateral and multilateral tracks of the Middle East peace 
talks. 
(AUTHOR:  MURRAY.  QUESTIONS AN/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH  CS 23/0020Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-49 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-25Apr94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Local Executives Push for Legislative Influence </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Local Executives Push for Legislative Influence </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      In several regions local administration heads took advantage of 
their ability to set the rules for local elections to promote 
executive influence in local legislatures by allowing executive 
officials to run for legislative seats and simultaneously retain 
their executive branch positions.  Despite official protests over 
these attempts--charging that the constitutional principle of 
separation of powers is being undermined--the central government 
does not appear to have censured or tried to rein in the local 
executives involved.  The Yeltsin administration may hope that 
the local executives' presence will counterbalance hardline 
communist influence in the legislatures, but the administration 
may also find that, having won voter mandates and a legislative 
seat, these local executives will be in a stronger position to 
counterweigh demands from Moscow. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   In the absence of action to set nationwide rules for local 
elections from either President Boris Yeltsin or the legislature, 
local executives ended up with a very large say in setting 
procedures for  the recent local legislative elections in their 
regions.  According to Central Electoral Commission (CEC) Deputy 
Chairman Aleksandr Ivanchenko, "the election procedure in the 
provinces is determined by the heads of administrations, 
according to Article 77 of the [federal] constitution" (See Note 
1), and the CEC "has no right to impose rigid standards on the 
regions" (Izvestiya, 3 February).  In addition, local executives 
may have been prompted to take matters into their own hands at 
the failure of the State Duma to flesh out constitutional 
provisions regarding the conduct of local elections.  Three State 
Duma resolutions on local elections--two calling for presidential 
revision of local election procedures and one proposing the 
cancellation of local elections--were defeated (Segodnya, 10 
February). 
   (Note 1)  Article 77 of the Russian Federation Constitution 
states that "the system of organs of state power of the 
republics, krays, oblasts, cities of federal significance, the 
autonomous oblast, and autonomous okrugs is established by the 
components of the Russian Federation independently in accordance 
with the fundamentals of the constitutional system of the Russian 
Federation and the general principles of the organization of 
representative and executive organs of state power established by 
federal law" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 10 November 1993). 
   Executive Branch Invades Legislative 
   In several regions, local administration heads took advantage of 
their ability to set the rules for local elections to attempt to 
ensure--in disregard of the constitution's pronouncement in favor 
of separation of powers (Article 10)--that administration 
officials hold a large share of the seats in those legislatures: 
   -- In Kursk Oblast, 21 of the 36 deputies elected on 27 March 
were rayon administration heads, "meaning that they themselves 
will write the local laws as well as executing and monitoring 
them," according to Rossiyskaya Gazeta (30 March). 
   -- In Vologda Oblast, 18 officials from the oblast and rayon 
administrations have been registered as candidates for the 15 
deputies' seats in the oblast duma, according to a 5 March 
Izvestiya article. 
   -- In Rostov Oblast, "all eight heads of rayon administrations 
registered as candidates for the local City Duma" (Rossiyskiye 
Vesti, 3 March).  In the 27 March oblast duma election, executive 
branch officials won roughly two-thirds of the 45 legislative 
seats (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 30, 31 March). 
   -- In Orenburg Oblast, executive branch officials ran for the 
oblast legislature despite an appeal from oblast Head of 
Administration V. Yelagin to rayon administration leaders not to 
run.  Eleven were subsequently elected to the oblast duma 
(Rossiyskiye Vesti, 29 March). 
   In some cases, the chief executives extended their influence over 
local representative bodies more directly, seemingly unwilling to 
chance the ballot box.  Vologda Oblast Governor Nikolay Podgornov 
issued an electoral decree and statute reportedly allowing the 
heads of administration, which he appoints, to chair the Vologda 
and Cherepovets city dumas and smaller rayon assemblies 
(Izvestiya, 5 March).  Podgornov also reportedly "abolished" city 
councils entirely in the cities of Velikiy Ustyug, Totma, 
Belozersk, Ustyuzhna, and Kirillov (Izvestiya, 27 January).  A 22 
February Komsomolskaya Pravda issue asserted that, in the Tula 
Oblast electoral statute, oblast Head of Administration Nikolay 
Sevryugin has reserved for himself the power to appoint "a 
section" of the deputies to the oblast legislature. 
   The phenomenon of local executives running for local legislative 
seats was widespread and apparently was supported by the voters. 
A 1 April Rossiyskiye Vesti analysis of local election results 
reported that "a total of 463 [heads of administration] took 
part" in local election campaigns, and in some regions they 
comprise "up to 40 percent of the representative assemblies." 
The analysis lists that "in Voronezh Oblast 18 of the 45 elected 
representatives are heads of administration at all levels; in 
Irkutsk Oblast--10 out of 45; in Kaluga Oblast--21 out of 45; in 
Nizhniy Novgorod Oblast--14 out of 45; and in Novgorod Oblast--11 
out of 27."  An 11 March Trud article reported that following the 
30 January elections in Penza Oblast, the 45-member local 
legislature consists of 20 heads of administrations or their 
deputies. 
   Silence From the Kremlin 
   The Yeltsin administration apparently made little effort to 
prevent heads of administration from invading the legislatures. 
Deputy Chief of the administration's Directorate for Work with 
the Territories Sergey Samoylov conceded that, despite Yeltsin's 
commitment to the operation of the principle of separation of 
powers, virtually all organizational questions regarding local 
legislative power are being settled by executive structures.  He 
emphasized, however, that normative acts of executives regarding 
local elections undergo "mandatory expert analysis" in the 
president's administration and are "invariably coordinated" with 
the CEC.  Samoylov attributed local executive frequent successes 
in the balloting to the voters' taking a greater stake in local 
affairs, saying that voters have "entrusted mandates to the 
people who control the real levers of power, and who therefore 
will be able to do something for them."  He also noted, however, 
that some localities--as in St. Petersburg and Nizhniy Novgorod- 
-banned the administration heads from running (Trud, 11 March). 
   Tacit Approval? 
   The Yeltsin administration's failure to mount a stronger protest 
against the heads of administrations suggests that they may have 
viewed the prospect of the administration heads extending their 
influence in local legislatures as a desirable counterweight to a 
communist or hardline nationalist presence in those bodies. 
Rossiyskiye Vesti correspondent Gennadiy Belotserkovskiy wrote 
that the electorate has "no alternative" but to choose between 
the entrenched bureaucrats and diehard communist opposition in 
the regions.  Rostov Oblast Head of Administration Vladimir Chub 
defended the registration of all eight heads of rayon 
administrations as candidates for the oblast legislature, 
reportedly stating that "if the executive is not allowed into the 
representative branch, it will indeed be dominated by the 
communists." 
   Checks Unbalanced 
   Despite the absence of a clear stand by the Yeltsin 
administration, some local officials and others objected to the 
intrusion into legislative affairs: 
   -- Vologda Oblast Duma candidate Albert Volkov condemned oblast 
administration employees' running for legislative positions as a 
violation of the constitutional principle of the separation of 
powers.  The oblast prosecutor's office and local leaders of 
conservative and reformist parties alike protested Podgornov's 
acts subordinating city dumas and rayon assemblies to his 
appointed heads of administration, charging that these provisions 
contradict the federal constitution.  Podgornov reportedly 
"rejected" the oblast prosecutor's protest and has not been 
observed to have addressed the concerns of the other complainants 
(Izvestiya, 5 March). 
   -- Rostov Oblast presidential representative Vladimir Zubkov was 
reportedly "concerned" at the trend of combining executive and 
legislative posts, asserting that when the question of combining 
posts was discussed in February by the Public Chamber "virtually 
everyone from Sobchak to Zhirinovskiy agreed" that combination 
was "inadmissible" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 3 March). 
   Implications 
   "Name recognition" will likely continue to carry local executive 
branch officials into legislative seats, though this trend at the 
same time significantly diminishes, if not snuffs out entirely, 
any local system of checks and balances on the executive branch 
of local government.  It is still unclear, however, whether local 
administration heads will be consistently open toward 
implementing the center's reforms.  Although some may be amenable 
to reform, many may continue to resist-reform at the local level 
in order to soften the effects of reform on their constituents. 
   The Yeltsin administration's laissez-faire policy toward local 
self-government will probably prove costly as local executives 
are likely to use their new bases and popular election mandate in 
the legislatures to press for greater autonomy from Moscow. 
   BOX 
            Heads' of Administration Checkered Background 
   Although the local heads of administration are appointed by 
President Boris Yeltsin, they have a mixed record in supporting 
the president and reform policies.  In the months following the 
August 1991 coup, many local administration heads began to 
distance themselves from Yeltsin by pursuing policies geared more 
toward local rather than Yeltsin's interests.  After Yeltsin 
threatened a showdown with the old Supreme Soviet in a 20 March 
1993 television address, few heads of administration gave him 
unequivocal support*.  In like fashion, many regional leaders 
took a cautious or negative stance following the Moscow crisis of 
October 1993.**  After each incident, Yeltsin replaced a number 
of administration heads that did not firmly support his views. 
   *    See the Trends of 29 March 1993, pages 1-23. 
   **   See the Trends of 6 October 1993, pages 15-19. 
   END BOX 
   (AUTHOR:  NERO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6112.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SM 25/2336Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-50 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
WARNING: PLEASE PASS TO STEVE FLEISCHMANN 
FBIS TRENDS-NORTH KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      Rhetorical Restraint Evident on Army Day </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Rhetorical Restraint Evident on Army Day </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In      a move suggesting that Pyongyang is still seeking to preserve 
avenues of dialogue with Washington, the North Korean leadership 
pulled some of its rhetorical punches vis-a-vis the United States 
in this year's media treatment of the 25 April anniversary of the 
founding of the Korean People's Army (KPA).  During this year's 
otherwise routine commemoration, Vice Marshal Kim Kwang-chin in 
his keynote speech, carried by Pyongyang radio on 24 April, 
avoided portraying the Koreans as having led "the anti- 
imperialist, anti-U.S. struggle" of the entire "revolutionary 
peoples of the world"--a prominent theme in last year's keynote 
speech, which was delivered by KPA Chief of Staff Choe Kwang 
(Pyongyang radio, 24 April 1993).  Moreover, Kim's speech omitted 
specific mention of the United States in touting the KPA's 
achievements at one point, saying merely that the army had won 
"victory" over the two "imperialist powers" in "the anti-Japanese 
revolutionary war" and the Korean war--a departure from the 
standard depiction of the KPA as having smashed "the two 
imperialisms of the United States and Japan." 

   In line with the rhetorical restraint on the United States, 
Pyongyang media have not been observed to report or comment on 
Assistant Secretary of State Robert L. Gallucci's recent trip to 
South Korea, in spite of the fact that he was widely reported to 
have discussed the possibility of UN sanctions against North 
Korea over the nuclear issue (Seoul KBS-1 radio, 18 April). 
Assistant Secretary Gallucci headed the U.S. delegation last 
summer in the U.S.-North Korea high-level talks. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CL 26/1609Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-51 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-057--Russia 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA:  Blitz Raises Profile in Mideast Diplomacy </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       RUSSIA:  Blitz Raises Profile in Mideast Diplomacy </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In      the wake of the Hebron massacre and the resultant disruption 
to the Arab-Israeli peace talks, the Russians launched a carefully 
orchestrated diplomatic blitz with the apparent goals both of 
getting Israel and the PLO to continue their negotiations and of 
restoring Russia's role as a major player in Middle Eastern and 
international diplomacy.  A pair of high-level foreign ministry 
officials and a presidential representative shuttled to Israel and 
Tunisia to bring the parties back together. Fully supporting the 
PLO's request for an international presence to protect Palestinians 
in the occupied territories, the Russians pressed hard for a UN 
resolution, eventually adopted, condemning the massacre and calling 
for an international presence.  Additionally, seeking in large part 
to increase Russia's role in Middle Eastern diplomacy, the Moscow 
envoys proposed convening of a second international conference in 
Madrid to discuss new directions in the peace process. 

   After the violent murders of reportedly more than 50 Palestinians 
worshipping in the al-Ibrahimi Mosque by Israeli settler Dr. Barukh 
Goldstein on 25 February, Russian Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev, 
First Deputy Foreign Minister Igor Ivanov, and presidential envoy 
Viktor Posuvalyuk were dispatched on shuttle diplomacy missions to 
the Middle East at--it was pointedly noted in each case--President 
Boris Yeltsin's instructions. 

   In announcing Ivanov's dispatch to the Middle East, the Foreign 
Ministry declared Russia's support for measures to ensure the 
security of Palestinians in the territories, and, in a major 
initiative, called for a renewal of the Madrid conference to get the 
peace process back on track.  Radio Rossii broadcast a Foreign 
Ministry statement reporting that Ivanov had been sent to the Middle 
East to meet with PLO Chairman Yasir 'Arafat and Israeli leaders "at 
the personal instruction of the President of the Russian Federation" 
and that "Russia believes it necessary for the UN Security Council 
to adopt an effective resolution with a view to ensuring security on 
the occupied territories.  The idea of international protection for 
the civilian population on the occupied territories deserves most 
serious attention."  The statement also proclaimed that "a new 
international impetus is needed for the cause of reconciliation 
between Arabs and Israelis to proceed further.  A second plenary 
meeting of the Madrid conference on the Middle East at the foreign 
minister level could be this impetus" (Moscow Radio Rossii Network 
in Russian 1100 GMT 2 Mar 94).  Russian media reported that Ivanov 
delivered a personal message to 'Arafat from Yeltsin who expressed 
"Russia's firm intention to promote the attainment of comprehensive 
peace and security in the Middle East in every way."  Upon his 
return, Ivanov reported that the issues of ensuring the safety of 
the Palestinian population in the occupied territories, the PLO 
proposal to send international observers to the territories, and the 
holding of a second Madrid conference on Middle East peace at the 
foreign minister level were discussed "during intensive talks in 
both Tunisia and Israel" (Moscow ITAR-TASS in English 0921 GMT 6 Mar 
94). 

   Kozyrev Mission 

   Although Ivanov was the first diplomat to engage in shuttle 
diplomacy, Kozyrev reported on 1 March that "at the president's 
instructions" he made contact with 'Arafat and Israeli Foreign 
Minister Shim'on Peres and asserted that both the PLO and Israel had 
requested active Russian participation to get the negotiations back 
on track.  Kozyrev stated that "the important thing is to provide 
for both sides a maximum political, and if necessary, material 
assistance, if you like, so that they can not only rescue the peace 
process but could also move onwards after this shock, this tragedy. 
This is because we want peace to prevail in the Middle East, and we 
cannot allow a bandit, or even a group of bandits, to disrupt this 
process."  Kozyrev observed that while Russia is not repudiating 
cooperation with the United States, its co-sponsor in the Middle 
East peace process, "it is clear that without an active Russian 
participation--both 'Arafat and the Israeli leaders have asked for 
that--this process cannot be saved" (Moscow Ostankino Television 
First Channel Network in Russian 2015 GMT 1 Mar 94). 

   Kozyrev left for Israel and Tunisia on 11 March, bearing "a 
personal message from the Russian president on the problems of 
ensuring a lasting peace in the region" (Moscow ITAR-TASS in English 
1217 GMT 10 Mar 94).  In a conversation with ITAR-TASS correspondent 
Aleksandr Zhudro, Kozyrev expressed satisfaction with his discussion 
with Israeli leaders and observed that "Russia is making unorthodox 
efforts for the sake of saving the peace process in this region." 
After the Hebron incident, Kozyrev said "it was necessary to take 
extraordinary measures for saving the agreements reached between 
Israel and the PLO earlier.  This visit, which is aimed at 
persuading the Israelis and the Palestinians to return to the 
negotiations table, was one of such measures" (Moscow ITAR-TASS 
World Service in Russian 1740 GMT 11 Mar 94). 

   While in Tunis, Kozyrev indicated strong Russian support for the 
PLO's position and optimistically predicted that talks would 
promptly resume if the UN approved the resolution condemning the 
massacre and providing for international protection.  Kozyrev 
reported on 12 March that 'Arafat "confirmed the PLO's firm 
adherence to the peace process" and expressed PLO commitment to 
resume talks with Israel, contingent upon the adoption of the UNSC 
Hebron resolution condemning the murders and calling for 
international protection in the occupied territories.  Kozyrev 
commented that "the decision of the Palestinian side demanded great 
political courage on the part of the PLO and of Yasir 'Arafat 
personally" (Moscow ITAR-TASS World Service in Russian 0640 GMT 12 
Mar 94).  In a 12 March statement, the Russian Foreign Ministry 
reiterated Kozyrev's observation about 'Arafat and welcomed the PLO 
decision to resume negotiations.  In reference to the UNSC draft 
resolution on Hebron, the statement made an appeal "to all sides to 
make the necessary efforts to have this resolution urgently approved 
by the Security Council.  This step would clear the way for a prompt 
resumption of talks aimed at concluding an agreement on Gaza and 
Jericho, and on other issues on the basis of the Declaration of 
Principles" (Moscow ITAR-TASS World Service in Russian 1518 GMT 12 
Mar 94). 

   Posuvalyuk Mission 

   Posuvalyuk, Yeltsin's special representative and director of the 
Russian Foreign Ministry's Near East and North Africa Department, 
began his  diplomacy mission on 7 March even before Kozyrev's 
arrival and remained after his departure.  Posuvalyuk had a number 
of meetings with 'Arafat in Tunis and reportedly delivered "an 
important message from Moscow addressed to the PLO leader and 
related to Russo-Palestinian consultations held in connection with 
the aggravation of the situation in the Middle East following the 
al-Khalil (Hebron) massacre" (Moscow ITAR-TASS in English 0857 GMT 
14 Mar 94). 

   Implying that Russian diplomacy was playing a central role in 
resolving the crisis, Foreign Ministry spokesman Grigoriy Karasin 
reported that the PLO-Israeli agreement on continuing peace talks 
and a final agreement on the Gaza Strip and Jericho had been 
formulated during Posuvalyuk's contacts "with the PLO leadership, 
the Israeli delegation, and U.S. and Norwegian high-ranking 
diplomats in Tunis."  Karasin stated that Posuvalyuk conveyed a 
personal message from Kozyrev to 'Arafat calling for the renewal of 
peace talks and confirming Russia's intention to assist in the 
implementation of UN Security Council Resolution 904, which was 
approved on 18 March (Moscow INTERFAX in English 1739 GMT 22 Mar 
94). 

   Results and Prospects 

   A 19 March Foreign Ministry statement hailed the adoption of UNSC 
Resolution 904 and the potential for successful continuation of the 
talks, attributing the success in large part to Russia's concerted 
diplomatic efforts:  "The initiating steps taken by the Russian co- 
sponsor--personal address by President Boris Yeltsin to the leaders 
of Israel and the PLO, a trip by the foreign minister to Israel and 
Tunisia, a series of contacts by Russian special representatives in 
the region and energetic efforts in the Security Council--not only 
facilitated the adoption of an effective resolution, but also laid 
the foundation for further progress in the Middle East peace 
process" (Moscow ITAR-TASS in English 1343 GMT 19 Mar 94). 

   Posuvalyuk emphasized that Russia intends to continue playing a 
large role in Middle East diplomacy.  He also stressed Russia's 
claim to a major role in the Mideast:  "Russia occupies its own 
ample niche in the Middle East region, to which, by virtue of its 
distinctiveness, primarily historical and spiritual, no one else can 
lay claim."  He asserted that Russian diplomacy intends to play "an 
essential role" not only in the Middle East, but also in other areas 
of international turmoil, increasing its efforts to resolve conflict 
situations (Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 12 Mar 94 p 5).  In an early 
April statement he also promised that "the Middle East theme will 
continue to dominate our foreign policy" (Moscow ITAR-TASS in 
English 1543 GMT 7 Apr 94). 

   While making clear their desire to reclaim a major role, Russian 
officials have at the same time pledged to continue cooperation with 
the United States.  The 12 March Foreign Ministry statement 
expressed such intent:  "Russia will continue to coordinate its own 
efforts with all interested parties.  We attach special importance 
to close interaction with the United States, which along with 
Russia, is a co-sponsor of the Middle East peace process."  In the 7 
April ITAR-TASS report, Posuvalyuk denied that the peace process 
"has acquired some element of competitiveness with the United 
States."  Although he admitted to "disruptions" in the co-sponsors' 
work on the peace process, he noted that "they were not caused by 
malicious intent on either side" and that both participants "must 
act extremely carefully while looking for ways of reaching peace 
between Arabs and Israelis."  Acknowledging that the United States 
and Russia pursue their separate interests in the region, Posuvalyuk 
commented that "this should not affect their efforts to help restore 
peace in the Middle East" and noted that future consultations 
between Russian and American officials in Washington are intended 
"to attain a greater degree of coordination in their joint work." 
   Madrid Revisited 

   Revival of the Madrid Conference forum is apparently one of 
Moscow's strategies for enlarging its role in regional diplomacy. 
Ivanov, who first raised the idea during his shuttle mission, said 
that 'Arafat was immediately supportive, but Israeli Foreign 
Minister Peres and U.S. Ambassador to Russia Thomas Pickering were 
not.  Peres and Pickering, he said, had to be persuaded that 
"Moscow's initiative does not mean giving up the achievements and 
formulas agreed upon at the Madrid Conference in October 1991, but 
is an attempt to find a new approach to Middle East realities which 
have changed in the past two years" (Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 11 
Mar 94 p 3).  Admitting that the U.S. and Israeli initial reactions 
to the conference proposal were "cool," Ivanov emphasized that 
Russia sought to establish new objectives for ensuring continuance 
of the peace process.  "We are confident that the present 
Palestinian-Israeli negotiations are close to completion and that we 
need to be thinking even  today about the future.  Stage one has 
been negotiated, and definite experience--both negative and 
positive--has been accumulated.  We now need to meet and think about 
how to further advance the peace process in all directions," said 
Ivanov (Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 10, 6-13 Mar 94 p 
5A). 

   Other Russian Foreign Ministry officials nevertheless 
subsequently played down the proposal for a "Madrid-2," suggesting 
that convening the conference is a long-term rather than immediate 
goal.  After his Vladivostok meeting with U.S. Secretary of State 
Warren Christopher, Kozyrev appeared to reduce Russian emphasis on 
the initiative, stating that "Russia is no longer insisting on the 
immediate holding of a second international conference on the Middle 
East," and that "the most important thing now was to complete work 
on the implementation of the agreement on Gaza and Jericho" (Moscow 
Radiostantsiya Moskvy in Russian 1605 GMT 14 Mar 94).  However, it 
appears likely that the issue may resurface in the future, since 
Viktor Gogitidze, deputy director of the MFA's Near East and North 
Africa Department, stated that "Russia's call for holding another 
international conference on the Middle East in Madrid remains in 
force."  Gogitidze asserted:  "This is a long-term proposal.  The 
first stage of the peace process is almost concluded.  It is 
necessary to pass to the second stage, since, in addition to 'the 
Palestinian direction,' there are the 'Jordanian,' 'Syrian,' and 
other ones.  There is a need to work in all these directions, and 
the Madrid-2 conference could play a positive role in this" (Moscow 
INTERFAX in English 1559 GMT 16 Mar 94). 

(AUTHOR:  KENSKI.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CISD (703) 733-6375.) 

ENEAG/26 APR/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/CL 26/1903Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-52 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-058--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  MONGOLIAN YOUTH ASSOCIATION ELECTION RESULTS </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  MONGOLIAN YOUTH ASSOCIATION ELECTION RESULTS </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      Second General Assembly of the Mongolian Youth Association 
(MYA) held elections to its Presidium and Control Council in 
December 1993.  The names of persons elected to the two bodies, 
their ages (ranging from 23 to 37) and their affiliated 
organizations or professions were reported in the youth organization 
newspaper MONGOLYN DZALUUCHUUD. 

   I.  Presidium Members 

   The following were elected members of the MYA Presidium: 

   1.  Sangajabyn Bayartsogt -- Position:  MYA president; Age:  26 

   2.  Batmonhiyn Bayarsayhan -- Position:  MYA secretary; Age:  28 

   3.  Bathuugiyn Bayarhuu -- Position:  "Altan urel" Company 
director; Age:  33 

   4.  Daadanhuugiyn Batbaatar -- Position:  State Great Hural 
member; Age:  29 

   5.  Gombyn Bathuu -- Position:  "Tsagaan uul" Company director; 
Age:   30 

   6.  Dendebiyn Batchuluun -- Position:  Head of the MYA 
"Construction Worker" Youth Movement; Age:  33 

   7.  Galsansanjaagiyn Batbold -- 
Position:  Instructor at the University of Medicine and "Hos bagana" 
center director; Age:  29 

   8.  Suhbaataryn Batmonh -- Position:  Editor-in-chief of MONGOLYN 
DZALUUCHUUD; Age:  33 

   9.  Dambyn Ganbat -- Position:  Academy for Political Development 
research worker and director of the MYA "Polisi" Training Center; 
Age:  31 

   10.  Galsangiyn Ganbold -- Position:  MYA adviser and director of 
the "Dzaluu udirdagch" fund; Age:  33 

   11.  Darambadzaryn Galbayar -- Position:  Instructor at the 
Mathematics Institute of the Mongolian National University for Arts; 
Age:  26 

   12.  Gombyn Dzoljargal -- Position:  Responsible editor of the 
Mongolian Television General Editorial Board for Youth; Age:  29 

   13.  Naydansurengiyn Dzolgargal -- Position:  Director of the 
Mongolian Stock-Exchange; Age:  29 

   14.  Tserenchimediyn Dzorigtbaatar -- Position:  MYA secretary; 
Age:   25 

   15.  Erdene-Ochiryn Dzolbayar -- Position:  President of the 
"Atsar" Trade and Production Services Company; Age:  24 

   16.  Dorjsurengiyn Jargalsayhan -- Position:  President of the 
Sports Association of Mongolian Students and Specialists of the 
Committee for Sports and Youths subordinate to the Government; Age: 
28 

   17.  Jasrangiyn Jantsan -- Position:  General director of the 
"Siylen" Company; Age:  29 

   18.  Yadamsurengiyn Sanjmyatab -- Position:  MYA general 
secretary; Age:  33 

   19.  Chimediyn Sayhanbileg -- Position:   MYA secretary; Age:  24 

   20.  Yadmaagiyn Tomorbaatar -- Position:  MYA secretary; Age:  29 

   21.  Abirmediyn Erdenebaatar -- Position:  State inspector of the 
Suhbaatar District Office; Age:  23 

   II.  Control Council Members 

   The following individuals were elected members of the MYA Control 
Council: 

   1.   Luuszanbadamyn Gan-Oldziy -- Position:  Director of the 
Statistical Sector of the Tob Aymag Government Office and MYA 
chairman; Age:  30 

   2.   Rinchinyamyn Amarjargal -- Position:  Economics College 
director; Age:  32 

   3.   Darmaagiyn Bilegsayhan -- Position:  MYA sponsored "GUUR" 
newspaper correspondent; Age:  27 

   4.   Delgeriyn Batbaatar -- Position:  Cultural Services 
"Dzaluus" Center chief accountant; Age:  35 

   5.   Dashdabaagiyn Batbayar -- Position: "Hamtyn huch" Trade and 
Production Company general director; Age: 37 

   6.   Gurbadamyn Dzurgaanjin -- Position:  Erdenet City "Tasun" 
Company chief accountant; Age:  31 

   7.   Dashdorjiyn Ornohdelger -- Position:  Economist at the 
"Tahi-Ko" Production, Services and Trade Company; Age:  33 

   8.   Dorjdagabyn Tserennadmid -- Position:  Inspector of the 
Baganuur District Militia Department; Age:  29 

   9.   Purebjabyn Tsolmonbaatar -- Position:  Construction engineer 
at the Bugat DM-2 BBHK (expansion not given); Age:  33 

   10.  Tserenchimediyn Saynbayar -- Position:  Second course 
student at KTMS (expansion not given) subordinate to the Technical 
University; Age:  25 

   11.  Chuluunbaataryn Erdenechimeg -- Position:  Hobsgol Aymag 
Communications Office accountant; Age:  25 

   12.  Nyamtserengiyn Erhuu -- Position:  Nurse at the State Clinic 
General Hospital No 2; Age:  23 
   (Ulaanbaatar MONGOLYN DZALUUCHUUD in Mongolian No 44 December 
1993 p 1) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION (703) 733-6375.) 

ENEAG/26 APR/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/CL 26/1918Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-53 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-26APR94-CHINA-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Angles for MFN Renewal, Makes Gesture on Human Rights </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Angles for MFN Renewal, Makes Gesture on Human Rights </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                       With the deadline for a U.S. decision on renewing most-favored- 
nation (MFN) trading status for China fast approaching, Beijing 
has made a gesture on human rights by releasing Tiananmen-era 
dissident Wang Juntao even while continuing to reject formal 
linkage between MFN and human rights.  Seeking to influence the 
annual MFN debate as the deadline for renewal approaches, Beijing 
has also widely publicized its alleged compliance on a number of 
other issues of concern to Washington.  In addition, it has 
reemphasized the negative economic consequences that will result 
should the Clinton administration fail to grant China MFN trading 
status this year.  However, Beijing's current anxiety about 
stability suggests that repression of dissidents will continue. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Playing an important trump card in the annual MFN debate, Beijing 
has repeated its practice in recent years of releasing a jailed 
dissident as the deadline for MFN renewal draws near.  According 
to a spokesman for the Ministry of Justice on 23 April, Wang 
Juntao--who had been serving a 13-year sentence for his alleged 
role in the Tiananmen Square prodemocracy protest--was released 
"on bail" because of the "conditions of his illness" and had 
"left for medical treatment abroad" (Xinhua, 23 April).  Last 
year Beijing had similarly released from jail Democracy Wall 
activist Xu Wenli. 

   Wang's release, however, does not appear to reflect a fundamental 
change in Beijing's attitude toward dissident activity.  Western 
media since mid-March have reported the detention of a number of 
leading dissidents, including Xu Wenli himself and his former 
colleague, noted dissident Wei Jingsheng.  Although in most cases 
the detentions have been brief, Xu and Wei are still in custody. 
According to a 13 April report carried by the French press agency 
AFP, Xu appears to be under some sort of "house arrest."  A 
"special dispatch" in the 15 April edition of the PRC-owned Hong 
Kong daily Ta Kung Pao quoted a PRC Foreign Ministry spokesman, 
at a press conference on the 14th, as indicating that Wei may be 
facing criminal charges.  He reportedly said that the case of Wei 
is "not an issue of human rights" and that the "so-called human 
rights" issue does not mean "simply releasing criminals." 
   Beijing in recent days has been taking a particularly hardline 
stance on human rights, rejecting Washington's insistence that 
progress on human rights is a condition of MFN renewal.  Minister 
of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation Wu Yi, for example, 
showed no flexibility on the human rights issue during her recent 
trip to the United States for the eighth session of the Sino-U.S. 
Joint Committee on Commerce and Trade.  In a 6 April interview 
with Xinhua, she reiterated Beijing's longstanding "opposition" 
to the U.S. practice of "linking" MFN with human rights, warning 
that "proper handling" of China's MFN status is an "important 
condition" for the further development of bilateral trade and 
economic relations.  Echoing these remarks at a speech in New 
York, the MOFTEC head said that associating trade issues with 
human rights is "extremely unwise (feichang bumingzhi)" and shows 
a "lack of strategic foresight" (Xinhua, 16 April). 

   PRC commentary has also underscored this hardline stance on human 
rights.  An article in the 18 April edition of Beijing's current 
affairs journal Liaowang, for example, highlighted the 
differences between China and the United States on human rights. 
Exploring the reasons for these divergent views, the article 
concluded that they do not just stem from differences in 
"cultural ideas" or reflect Washington's "hegemonic mentality." 
Instead, the article claimed the United States is attempting to 
use the human rights issue as a "point to break through to 
threaten China's existing system so that China will be in a state 
of chaos or weakness." 

   Images of Compliance 

   In an apparent effort to demonstrate Beijing's compliance on 
other MFN-related issues of concern to Washington, even while 
rejecting Washington's demands on human rights, PRC media have 
claimed progress in protecting intellectual property rights 
(IPR), stemming illegal textile exports and emigration, and 
cracking down on traffic in endangered species.  In addition, 
they have warned of sizable economic losses if MFN is not 
renewed. 

   IPR Protection 

   Beijing in recent days has taken particular pains to emphasize 
its efforts to protect intellectual property rights.  Speaking at 
the recent National People's Congress (NPC) session on 15 March, 
Supreme People's Court President Jen Jianxin, for example, 
claimed that China's new system of IPR courts has demonstrated 
the "great importance" Beijing attaches to IPR protection by 
handling "2,777 cases of IPR and technological contract disputes" 
last year--an increase of 16.39 percent over 1992 (Xinhua, 25 
March).  A 29 March article in Beijing's English-language paper 
China Daily also enumerated Beijing's progress in prosecuting IPR 
cases.  Quoting an unnamed "court official," the paper noted that 
Beijing's IPR courts, since being established last July, have 
"heard 125 cases and issued rulings on 87 of them," while the 
courts in Fujian have "investigated 47 suits."  According to the 
official, the courts in Shanghai have been even more active, 
handling "more than 600 cases" since their establishment in 
February this year.  Suggesting that Beijing intends to expand 
its efforts in this area, the official indicated that more courts 
are being established as "part of a nationwide effort to 
safeguard trademarks, copyrights, and patents." 

   At the same time, a 17 March report in Hebei Ribao on the work 
report of the Hebei Provincial Higher People's Court suggested 
that, even without the establishment of special IPR courts, the 
provinces are prosecuting IPR violations.  Delivering a report to 
the second session of the eighth provincial people's congress on 
1 March, Ping Yujie, president of the court, said that in 1993 
the provincial courts tried "8,907 cases on compensation for 
damage, intellectual property rights, and labor disputes." 
Other Chinese media reporting has also sought to demonstrate 
China's progress in protecting IPR: 

   -- A 25 March Beijing radio report on an international seminar in 
Kunming on copyright protection and economic and cultural 
development in Asia claimed that China has made "major progress" 
in IPR protection, bringing its own legal system "into line" with 
international practices and "basically establishing a copyright 
system."  The report claimed that the State Copyright 
administration and local copyright administrations have "strictly 
enforced" China's copyright laws and "cracked down on all kinds 
of serious copyright infringement cases."  In particular, the 
report noted that the State Copyright Administration has 
investigated a "batch of key copyright infringement cases 
concerning foreigners" and has taken "disciplinary action" 
against 11 domestic units and individuals. In addition, the 
report noted that a "collective copyright administration system" 
and a "copyright agent system" have been established and 16 
copyright agencies have been set up to "act as a bridge" in 
introducing Chinese works overseas and bringing foreign works 
into China. 

   -- In an interview carried by Beijing radio on 2 April, Gao 
Lulin, director of the State Patent Office, noted that in 1993 
the Chinese Government accepted over 77,000 patents and that the 
courts and patent offices, according to "incomplete statistics," 
handled "2,000 cases of patent disputes." 

   Most recently PRC media have highlighted Beijing's effort to 
crack down on the pirating of audio and video material.  Kicking 
off a new campaign on 19 April, Xinhua carried a "joint circular" 
issued by the CPC Propaganda Department, the Press and 
Publications Administration, the State Planning Commission, 
MOFTEC, the General Administration of Customs, the State 
Administration for Industry and Commerce, and the State Copyright 
Administration calling for "strengthened control" over the 
industry and the "strict investigation and severe punishment" of 
those guilty of copyright infringement.  Reporting on the 
crackdown in Guangdong Province, Xinhua's Hong Kong service on 21 
April claimed that teams had just completed searches of "1,657 
vendors and had seized 140,000 compact discs, 1,322 laser discs, 
and 85,000 audio and video tapes."  Xinhua went on to say that 
the Guangzhou City Copyright Administration publicly "destroyed" 
more than 63,000 pirated compact discs and audio and video tapes. 
Suggesting that additional measures are in the offing, Xinhua 
said that Guangdong Province will place "all" of the province's 
16 compact disc factories under the control of its press and 
publication department. 

   Illegal Textile Exports 

   PRC media have also touted Beijing's success in stemming the flow 
of illegal textile exports, the focus of PRC media reporting on 
the "fourth national work conference to curb and crack down on 
illegal entrepot trade in textiles."  According to a 10 April 
Xinhua account of the meeting that day, four more Chinese 
enterprises have been "severely punished" for their illegal 
textile exports. 

   -- Two companies in Guangdong Province's Shantou City--Shifa 
Dressmaking Company, Ltd. and the Yongjia Garment Manufacturing 
Company, Ltd.--had their goods seized and their textile export 
rights "suspended" for two years.  In addition, Guangdong's 
textile quota for 1995 was "reduced" and MOFTEC "suggested" that 
"administrative punishment" be meted out to those "directly 
responsible" for the fraud. 

   -- Xiamen City in Fujian Province also had its textile quota for 
1995 reduced as a result of transshipments by the Guangyu 
Shareholding Xiamen Company, which in turn was fined a sum equal 
to "20 percent of the value of the contract" and lost its textile 
export rights for two years. 

   -- However, the harshest penalty was meted out to a company in 
Shenyang--the Shankou branch of the Dongmao Industrial Company- 
-whose shipment of goods was "tracked down and seized" by U.S. 
Customs.  The company lost all its textile product export quotas 
as well as its right to apply for an export quota in 1994.  In 
addition, MOFTEC "ordered" Shenyang City's Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation Commission to "suspend all business 
activities" of the Shankou branch of the company and "suggested" 
that "administrative punishments" be meted out to those "directly 
responsible." 

   While MOFTEC has announced punishments for illegal third country 
textile transshipments in the past, the punishments this time 
appear harsher than those given five firms at the "third national 
working conference. on cracking down on illicit textile transfers" 
last December.  At that conference, it was announced that, while 
all five firms were to have their "illegal incomes" confiscated, 
only three would have their textile trading rights and their 1994 
"home regions'" export quotas "slashed." 

   In addition to announcing punishments for the four textile firms, 
the speakers at the conference indicated that MOFTEC plans new 
steps to stop illicit shipments.  Speaking on 10 April, MOFTEC 
Vice Minister Shi Guangsheng said that the ministry would 
"strengthen" its efforts to prevent illegal shipments, even 
though the "amount of illegal transit textiles exported after 
clearing customs is really insignificant" (Xinhua, 10 April).  In 
1994, he noted, M0FTEC will continue to carry out "random checks 
of key areas and enterprises."  In addition, he said the ministry 
would "strengthen" its training of personnel assigned to crack 
down on illegal shipments and "coordinate closely" with other 
countries and the authorities in "relevant regions" in order to 
curb the illegal transit trade. 

   Illegal Emigration 

   Reporting on Beijing's efforts in this area, a 4 April report 
carried by the Hong Kong-based PRC-affiliated press agency 
Zhongguo Tongxun She pointed out that in 1993 China "cracked" 95 
cases of attempted illegal emigration involving 1,970 people.  In 
addition, the report said that the "303 organizers" of these 
attempts were arrested.  More recently, on 22 April, the press 
agency reported that public security forces and border guards in 
the "cities of Shantou, Huizhou, and Foshan of Guangdong 
Province" had broken "three major cases" of illegal emigration, 
detaining "153 illegal emigrants from Fujian and Hunan and 
seizing four organizers from Taiwan and the mainland."  In one 
case, the report said, the ship captain stated that he had been 
ordered to carry "more than 100" illegal emigrants "to Mexico." 

   Endangered Species Protection 

   Beijing has also been projecting an image of compliance in the 
fight to protect endangered species.  A "special article" carried 
by Zhongguo Tongxun She on 21 March, for example, highlighted 
Beijing's efforts to crack down on the illicit trade in 
rhinoceros horns and tiger parts.  Beijing's progress in 
protecting wildlife was also showcased in a 3 April Xinhua report 
describing provincial steps to protect and breed Siberian tigers 
and in a 12 April Xinhua report that quoted U.S. Interior 
Secretary Bruce Babbit as saying, at a meeting that day with PRC 
State Councillor Song Jian, that he was "deeply impressed" with 
China's efforts to protect the giant panda and other rare animals 
and with its "enforcement" of laws against the trade in 
endangered species. 

   At the same time, Beijing, at a 6 April conference sponsored by 
the Environment and Resources Protection Committee of the 
National People's Congress, indicated that it plans to take 
"tougher" measures against those who "severely violate" the 
country's environmental laws (Xinhua, 6 April).  In addition, the 
conference noted that the committee plans to seek "modification" 
of China's present laws in order to punish environmental 
violators "as severely" as those caught smuggling or drug 
trafficking. 

   Warning on Economic Losses 

   In addition to publicizing its efforts to address U.S. concerns 
on a range of issue, Beijing has used a tactic frequently 
employed in the past in its quest for renewal of MFN status, 
pointedly reminding the Clinton administration of the economic 
consequences that could result from a failure to renew its MFN 
trading status.  Taking this approach in her Xinhua interview on 
6 April, MOFTEC Minister Wu Yi outlined China's plans to offer 
"800 investment projects" for discussion and to purchase "goods 
worth hundreds of millions of dollars" in what she said would be 
China's "largest trade and investment activity in the United 
States in the past 15 years."  However, she went on to suggest 
that U.S. involvement in these activities would depend on 
Washington's "proper handling" of the MFN question.  Providing 
further evidence of the potential for negative economic fallout 
if MFN is not renewed, Chinese media continue to routinely quote 
American corporate executives concerning the losses their 
companies will face if China's MFN status is not renewed. 

   Outlook 

   Although Beijing has not backed away from its official position 
that human rights must not constitute a condition of MFN renewal, 
its release of Wang Juntao suggests that the leadership will make 
calculated conciliatory gestures to promote MFN renewal.  China's 
leaders have apparently calculated that a media blitz claiming 
compliance with U.S. conditions across a broad spectrum of issues 
combined with a human rights gesture at the final hour will tip 
the political scales in Washington in their favor.  However, 
given Beijing's concerns about domestic stability, it is unlikely 
that China will alter its fundamental approach to human rights. 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6069.) 
EAG/HEIPLE/CL 26/1940Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-54 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-26APR94-EAST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      East Europe: Russian Posture on NATO Irks Walesa, Havel </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       East Europe: Russian Posture on NATO Irks Walesa, Havel </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Seemingly      anxious that Russia is attempting to increase its 
influence in the region, Polish and Czech leaders have expressed 
concern about new Russian terms for participating in NATO's 
Partnership for Peace.  On the eve of a meeting of seven Central 
European presidents in Litomysl, Czech Republic, Polish President 
Lech Walesa likened Russian conditions for joining PFP to the 
1945 Yalta agreement, warning in an interview that a new NATO 
with a strong Russian role could "push America out of Europe" and 
"create the United States of Russia" (Prague radio, 13 April). 
Repeating his concerns during a debate televised by Prague TV at 
the conference, Walesa contended that Russia does not want to be 
a "real partner, the meaning of which they do not understand." 
Czech President Vaclav Havel echoed this sentiment at the 
meeting, saying that Russia "ought not claim superpower status on 
the one hand, while at the same time enjoying the same rights as 
the small Central European countries."  Havel added that "some 
ideas now emerging in Russian politics should be really sharply 
criticized and denounced," particularly the view that "just 
because Russia is such a big state, it kind of owns us and 
automatically enjoys the right to advise us." During the same 
discussion, Hungarian President Arpad Goncz and Slovak President 
Michal Kovac did not express similar concerns. 

   Even before Russia suggested that new terms would be required for 
their participation in NATO, both Walesa and Havel were strongly 
critical of Russia's position on NATO expansion, particularly 
since Russian President Boris Yeltsin expressed reservations 
about East Europe's admission in December (Trends of 5 January, 
pages 1-7).  Yeltsin said in a letter to NATO members that he 
viewed East European efforts to join NATO with "alarm" (Mlada 
Fronta Dnes, 2 December), while Foreign Minister Andrei Kozyrev 
told Czech journalists that NATO expansion without Russia "does 
not suit us" (Rude Pravo, 29 November).  Responding to this 
position in a 25 February Warsaw radio interview, Walesa said 
that although East Europe is "now forgiving" Russia for its past 
domination of the region, Russia "wants us again in its embrace." 
He warned that "yesterday it was our grandfathers" who suffered 
under the Russians "and tomorrow it will be you" unless "the 
whole of Europe says, 'Is Poland free, Mister Kozyrev? Is it 
entitled to make independent decisions? What business is it of 
yours?'"  Havel also rebuked the Russians, saying on a trip to 
Rome that "Russia cannot decide on our behalf which international 
organizations we can or cannot join" (RAI TV, 7 March).  In an 
interview with a French journalist, Havel sought to explain 
recent shifts in Russian policy by noting that "there is a sort 
of nostalgia appearing in Russian society for the time when the 
nation was a great power with a wide scope of influence" (Le 
Point, 12 March). 
   (AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CL 26/2002Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-55 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-29APR94-HUNGARY 
<H3> <TI> </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE></PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Election:               Socialists Lead But Face Coalition Problems 

                               SUMMARY 

   Leading in all the major polls on the eve of the May 
parliamentary election, the Hungarian Socialist Party (MSZP) is 
apparently poised to make a remarkable comeback despite its 
liabilities as the successor of the former ruling communist 
party's reformist wing.  Since the party is expected to fall 
short of an absolute majority and lacks close allies, however, it 
is by no means certain that it will lead the new government 
coalition. 

                              END SUMMARY 

   All recent polls indicate that the MSZP, whose popularity has 
climbed considerably over the past year, is the strongest party 
going into the 8 May election and will emerge as the victor after 
the second round of balloting on 29 May.  According to a 
Hungarian Gallup Institute poll, based on data collected the 
middle of March, of those who indicate a party preference--29 
percent are undecided--31 percent would vote for the MSZP, four 
percent more than in the previous month (Magyar Hirlap, 5 April). 
Two other major public opinion research organizations, polling 
those who say they are "certain" to vote, also put the MSZP in 
first place.  According to the Szonda Ipsos organization's March 
findings, 23 percent of those "certain" to vote choose the MSZP 
(Magyar Hirlap, 25 March), while the Median organization's March 
data show that in the same category, the MSZP has the support of 
21 percent (Heti Vilaggazdasag, 2 April). 

   While none of these polls give the MSZP an overwhelming lead, 
their data tend to confirm that the party has a clear advantage 
over its nearest competitors.  All three polling organizations 
indicate that the two liberal parties, the Alliance of Free 
Democrats (SZDSZ) and the Federation of Young Democrats (Fidesz) 
are running neck and neck, well behind the MSZP: 

   -- According to Gallup, among those who have a party preference, 
Fidesz has 15 percent support and the SZDSZ 14 percent (as 
opposed to the MSZP's 31 percent). 

   -- According to Szonda Ipsos, Fidesz and SZDSZ each have 10 
percent support among those who are "certain" to vote (compared 
to the MSZP's 23 percent). 

   -- According to Median, the SZDSZ and Fidesz have 11 and 9 
percent support respectively among the "certain" voters (compared 
to 21 percent for the MSZP). 

   The big loser appears to be the main party in the present 
governing coalition, the Hungarian Democratic Forum (MDF).  The 
three polling organizations are virtually unanimous in reporting 
drastically decreased support for the MDF--which in 1990 got 
close to 25 percent of the vote in the first election round and 
ended up with 42 percent of the parliamentary seats--with Gallup 
giving the MDF 10 percent, Szonda Ipsos 9, and Median 7.  Two 
other parties are given a good chance of reaching the 5 percent 
threshold necessary for entering parliament: the Independent 
Smallholders Party (FKGP) and the Christian Democratic People's 
Party (KDNP). 

   Polling Reliability 

   Although polling agencies in Hungary did not forecast the 
decisive victory of the MDF in the second round of balloting in 
1990, they were fairly successful in assessing the parties' 
relative standing prior to the vote.  According to a table in the 
14 December 1993 issue of the weekly 168 Ora, the major polling 
organizations operating then--Gallup, Median, and the Public 
Opinion Research Institute (a now defunct organization, many of 
whose leading personnel currently work for Szonda Ipsos)--all 
correctly identified the MDF and the SZDSZ as the leading 
contenders, all correctly predicted that the MSZP would be 
soundly defeated, and all correctly predicted that Fidesz and the 
KDNP, along with the MSZP, would be the smallest parliamentary 
parties.  Even discounting probable improvements in polling 
procedures since then, it is likely that the pollsters are now at 
least roughly accurate in gauging the parties' relative strength. 

   Moderate Spectrum 

   While the alignment of parties in the new government is expected 
to change, the new parliament will comprise essentially the same 
parties that were voted into office in 1990.  With the possible 
exception of the Smallholders, an agrarian party that has tended 
to be fractious and unpredictable, all the parties that have a 
good chance of gaining entry to parliament fall into a relatively 
narrow political spectrum, all advocating integration with the 
West and privatization, despite their bitter debates over the 
process and pace of change.  The polls all indicate that 
extremist parties such as the far right Hungarian Justice and 
Life Party of Istvan Csurka or the far left Hungarian Workers 
Party--the remnant of the Kadarist Communist party--are unlikely 
to surmount the five percent threshold for entry to parliament, 
although Magyar Hirlap noted on 21 January that Csurka may have 
some "hidden" support that goes beyond the "less than one 
percent" registered by Szonda Ipsos.  According to the polls, the 
only minor parties that have some chance of gaining enough votes 
to enter parliament are the Entrepreneurs Party, the Republic 
Party, the Social Democratic Party, and the Agrarian Federation- 
-all moderate parties close to the political center. 

   Coalition Scenarios 

   Although the MSZP will probably have considerably more 
parliamentary seats after the election than the next largest 
party, it is highly unlikely to have a majority and will almost 
certainly face serious problems when it tries to form a 
government, because it has no natural allies among the other 
parties.  It is quite possible, as a journalist noted in the 20 
April issue of the centrist daily Magyar Hirlap, that the 
socialists, the liberals, and the parties of the present right- 
of-center coalition will each have one third of the seats, 
creating a situation in which "it will be difficult to form" any 
government.  Since it would be virtually impossible for the MSZP 
and the MDF to bridge their differences--Horn said that it would 
be "equivalent to deceiving the electors" if the MSZP formed a 
coalition with the MDF (Nepszabadsag, 1 April), while Prime 
Minister and MDF leader Peter Boross has said that his party 
would "by no means" form a coalition with the MSZP (MTI, 13 
April)--the formation of a governing coalition would seem to 
depend on the willingness of the liberals to cooperate with 
either the left or the right.  Even though a left-liberal or a 
right-liberal coalition appears to be the most likely outcome, 
forming either coalition will be a difficult feat: 

   MSZP-SZDSZ-Fidesz 

   The party that is most likely to enter a coalition with the MSZP 
is the SZDSZ, but it is certain to drive a hard bargain.  Aware 
of its difficult position, the MSZP has indicated that it is 
prepared to make major concessions to the SZDSZ, possibly even 
giving up the post of prime minister.  Asserting that his party 
does not rule out supporting SZDSZ prime ministerial candidate 
Gabor Kuncze after the election, MSZP chairman Horn has said that 
it is "not a key issue" for his party "that the leader of the new 
cabinet should come from the MSZP" (Magyar Hirlap, 5 January). 
Recently, prominent MSZP economic expert Laszlo Bekesi also 
indicated that his party "does not exclude" supporting a prime 
minister "from outside the party."  Calling Kuncze "an excellent 
person," Bekesi said that he saw no objection to Kuncze as prime 
minister (168 Ora, 19 April).  However, the MSZP and SZDSZ may 
not by themselves win a majority of the parliamentary seats, 
which they would need to form a government.  Moreover, the SZDSZ 
has indicated that being given the post of prime minister would 
not, by itself, be enough to draw it into the coalition as a 
junior partner.  Signaling a hardening of the SZDSZ's position, 
at a press conference on 1 April SZDSZ campaign chief Balint 
Magyar "stressed" that the SZDSZ would take part "only in a 
coalition that has a liberal majority" (Magyar Hirlap, 2 April). 

   As long as the SZDSZ insists on a liberal majority in the 
coalition, Fidesz, the other main liberal party, could be in a 
position to make or break a socialist-liberal coalition, even if 
the MSZP and SZDSZ  alone could form a majority government. 
Except in the unlikely event that a small centrist party such as 
the Entrepreneurs Party gets into parliament and helps the MSZP 
and SZDSZ form a majority, the MSZP's prospects will depend to a 
great extent on Fidesz--and the top Fidesz leadership is openly 
hostile to the MSZP.  After the wing of Fidesz that tended to 
pull more to the left went over to the SZDSZ last fall as the 
result of acrimonious intraparty struggles, Fidesz chairman 
Viktor Orban made it increasingly clear that although his party 
is highly critical of the right of center MDF government, it 
considers the post-communist left to be less acceptable 
politically than the right.  Orban said in a recent interview 
that it would be "impossible" for his party to join a coalition 
with the MSZP because the Hungarian public would "not forgive" 
the SZDSZ and Fidesz, which were the "most radical anti-communist 
parties" four years ago, for abandoning their principles. 
Responding to the interviewer's comment that there is a "war of 
messages" between him and MSZP chairman Gyula Horn--whom Orban 
holds to account for taking part in the armed suppression of the 
1956 anti-communist uprising--Orban accused the MSZP of 
threatening to take "revenge" on "everyone, especially us."  At 
the same time, Orban acknowledged that there is some "difference" 
between him and one faction of Fidesz regarding cooperation with 
the MSZP (Magyar Hirlap, 20 April), suggesting that he may be 
under pressure to consider entering a coalition with the 
socialists if the liberals gain significant concessions. 

   SZDSZ-MDF-Fidesz-KDNP 

   Although there is deep animosity between the SZDSZ and the MDF, 
they still might join forces against the MSZP.  With the rise in 
the MSZP's popularity, the MDF has reluctantly come to the 
conclusion that the SZDSZ is the lesser of two evils. 
Contradicting an earlier statement by MDF spokesman Karoly 
Herenyi that the MDF would not join a coalition with either the 
MSZP or the SZDSZ "under any circumstances" (Magyar Nemzet, 28 
December 1993), MDF parliamentary group chief Ferenc Kulin said 
that a coalition of the two liberal and two conservative parties 
is "possible" (Magyar Nemzet, 14 January).  Moreover,  Prime 
Minister and MDF leader Peter Boross recently made a distinction 
between his party's two main rivals, saying that while he has 
"serious reservations" about the SZDSZ, he does not reject it 
outright as a prospective coalition partner as he does the MSZP 
(MTI, 13 April).  For its part the SZDSZ has not declared that it 
is willing to cooperate with the MDF, but it appears ready to 
consider alternatives to the socialists.  Prime ministerial 
candidate Gabor Kuncze acknowledged in the April issue of the 
monthly Kritika that the SZDSZ has "reservations" about the MSZP, 
saying that his party is concerned that the MSZP's close ties to 
the powerful trade unions would undermine economic reform and 
that MSZP rule would encourage the "dangerous" spirit of 
"revenge" that has developed among former communists. 

   While it is unlikely that the MDF and SZDSZ alone would gain 
enough seats in parliament to form a government, if they managed 
to come to terms with each other they would probably be able to 
draw Fidesz and the KDNP into a liberal-right coalition. 
Although Defense Minister and MDF chairman Lajos Fur has 
complained that Fidesz speaks "lightly" of the MDF, making it 
difficult to find a "basis for cooperation" (Magyar Hirlap, 20 
April), both Fidesz and the MDF have indicated that they are 
striving to overcome their distaste for each other in the 
interest of cooperating against the left.  Similarly, although 
the KDNP has recently tried to "distance itself" from the MDF 
(Magyar Hirlap, 19 March) and has balked at the MDF's attempts to 
speed up privatization, for the most part the KDNP has been a 
reliable coalition partner of the MDF and shares many of its 
policy positions, making it highly probable that MDF-KDNP 
cooperation will continue. 

   Implications 

   It is entirely possible that the MSZP will not lead the next 
Hungarian government, even if it wins the election.  Although 
strains between the SZDSZ and Fidesz--caused mainly by 
disagreement over whether the liberals should be closer to the 
left or the right--have weakened the liberals, if they manage to 
draw together they may well be in a position to determine whether 
Hungary's next government is a left-liberal or right-liberal 
coalition.  Because the SZDSZ is likely to emerge as the stronger 
liberal party in the elections--polls show that SZDSZ supporters 
are more likely to vote than supporters of Fidesz (Magyar Hirlap, 
5 April) and that fewer voters reject the SZDSZ completely (Heti 
Vilaggazdasag, 2 April)--it may end up with the post of prime 
minister in either a left-liberal or right-liberal scenario. 
Although the MDF would be less likely than the socialists to give 
up the post of prime minister in the interest of forming a viable 
coalition, it might yield if SZDSZ moderates, supported by 
Fidesz, are persuasive in urging anti-left cooperation. 
   In any case, SZDSZ prime ministerial candidate Gabor Kuncze 
appears to be well suited to conducting his party's negotiations 
with either the left or right.  The pro-MDF paper Pesti Hirlap 
(16-17 April) has said that Kuncze was chosen by the SZDSZ as its 
candidate because he is a "presentable and even likable person in 
the center who can be accepted by the country's public," 
suggesting that he may have considerable strength as a 
conciliator.  It is far from certain, however, that he-- 
or anyone else--will be able to hold together Hungary's next 
governing coalition, which is likely to include far more 
disparate political elements than the present government. 
   (AUTHOR:  BARCZAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CL 26/2033Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-56 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-059--IRAN 
<H3> <TI>      IRAN:  COMPLAINTS TO NEWSPAPER REFLECT ECONOMIC, SOCIAL PROBLEMS, </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       IRAN:  COMPLAINTS TO NEWSPAPER REFLECT ECONOMIC, SOCIAL PROBLEMS, </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
No   4 

   This is the fourth in a series of media notes based on the SALAM 
newspaper column "Hello, SALAM," exploring the social problems 
facing the Iranian public.  Among the issues and complaints 
discussed are:  unemployment and the high cost of living; the 
exchange rate and the rising dollar; subsidies, the economic 
situation and class disparity; the invitation extended to King Fahd 
to visit Tehran; retirees and political parties.  The selections 
from the column published below are translated in full, including 
responses from SALAM when provided. 

   On Unemployment 

   Caller:  I am self-employed, but have been without work for a 
year.  I have a wife and two children.  My 100,000-toman deposit 
with the landlord has been exhausted during this last year and the 
landlord wants to kick us out.  I wonder what to do with my wife and 
two children.  I cannot tell anyone about my situation and do not 
want to beg.  I simply want to find a job for my wife and me so we 
can work and save our children.  God is my witness that if it were 
not for my wife and children, I would commit suicide.  Please tell 
us if there is anywhere we can go to get a job so that we can meet 
our basic needs.  (SALAM, 17 Feb) 

   On the High Cost of Medication, the Lack of Pharmacies 

   Caller:  Why does a tetanus shot, which last month cost 20 
tomans, now cost 550 tomans?  Tell me, what is our problem, low 
prices or overcharging?  (SALAM, 17 Feb) 

   Caller:  I represent a group from the city of Arsanjan in Fars. 
I have a question for Dr. Marandi, the Health Minister, as well as 
Dr. Nowbakht, his deputy in charge of medication.  Why should a city 
and its suburb of 40,000 have only one pharmacy without even a 
pharmacist, while a nearby city with the same population has three 
pharmacies?  Some people want to open a pharmacy in this city but 
the provincial deputy in charge of these matters will not give his 
approval.  (SALAM, 26 Feb) 

   On the Free Islamic University, Shahid Beheshti University 

   Caller:  I am a so-called economics major at the Free Islamic 
University of Tehran.  Unfortunately, I have to inform you that the 
atmosphere at this university is more like the military than a 
university.  Its atmosphere is not university-like, but rather, 
commercial.  Its disciplinary measures are not appropriate for a 
student's personality.  Their behavior is harsh, degrading and 
unislamic.  All that is missing is for them to use a stick on the 
students.   There is no sign of a conference or a seminar at this 
university.  It is necessary to hold regular seminars on current 
cultural, economic and social issues in these fields at these 
universities to change the students' indifference toward social 
issues.  (SALAM, 17 Feb) 

   Caller:  I am the father of a student at the Free University of 
North Tehran.  For the last two terms, they collected 33,100 tomans 
and 34,500 tomans respectively for the field of fisheries and the 
environment.  Now, they show us 26,340 tomans past due for the new 
term, while they showed our account cleared at that time.  We are 
mostly badly off and will have difficulty assuming this expense. 
Are these people supposed to do whatever they want.  The Ministry of 
Sciences says that the university is free and free to do what it 
wants.  Please pass this on to the officials.  (SALAM, 21 Feb) 

   Caller:  Several days ago, the students at Shahid Beheshti 
University assembled from 8 to 2pm to draw attention to the adverse 
condition of the dormitories.  Why didn't you publish anything about 
this in the newspaper? 
   SALAM:  That news was in the Wednesday 23 February issue, number 
804, p 2.  (SALAM, 1 Mar) 

   On the High Cost of Living 

   Caller:   As an expert in a governmental organization, I used to 
earn 80 thousand tomans.  They forced me into retirement yesterday. 
My salary dropped to 15 thousand tomans.  Who should I complain to? 
It is impossible to see the head of the organization or his deputy. 
Who should look into this matter?  (SALAM, 19 Feb) 

   Caller:  I am one of hundreds who spent the most precious years 
of his life with the defense industries.  Welding and lathing, I 
rose to a supervisory position in charge of the factory.  I was 
retired with a monthly salary of 9,000 tomans.  Because of the hard 
and exhausting work, I have lost 50 percent of my eyesight and 
health.  I am not able to work anymore.  I pay 10,000 tomans rent 
for one room and an unsanitary kitchen for my wife and sick daughter 
to "pass the night in," not to "live in."  To feed my family, I go 
all over Tehran.  I have been arrested several times by the police. 
Many of my co-workers are in the same situation.  (SALAM, 20 Feb) 

   Caller:  Tell our officials about the underpriviledged class 
fasting, in Ramadan, and having to buy chicken for 270 tomans a 
kilo.  Has the cost of the dollar risen because of Ramadan so that 
other goods can be increased proportionately, or is it because of 
Now Ruz?  The New Year bonus for civil servants would be thus 
absorbed.  With the rise of the dollar, the government made the 
money it was going to give out as new year bonuses.  Otherwise, it 
makes no sense for the dollar to reach 250 tomans in the absence of 
any economic or political event.  (SALAM, 21 Feb) 

   Caller:  I have been a newspaperman for 35 years.  I am 
spokesperson for Route 11 of Amiriyeh, which has 50-60 members.  The 
conditions forced upon us by city hall regarding the newsstands are 
unjust and unbearable.  First of all, everyone of us at different 
times, has paid as much money as one pays for a shop.  Legally, we 
own them.  We have even paid the taxes on them.  Furthermore, 
newspapermen, in spite of their hard work, are among the most 
deprived classes of the society.  There are old newspapermen among 
us with 50 years of service in this business, and they still can't 
afford to buy a motorcycle.  And, there are those who, if sick only 
for a day, couldn't buy their daily bread.  This is while we are 
deprived of many services, including health insurance.  With all of 
this, how can we pay 350,000 tomans to the municipality along with 
rent?  And that, for something that is ours and we have worked for. 
One family for several generations has spent its time and youth for 
this.  At any rate, these conditions are intolerable for us and we 
are not able to pay such an amount.  We ask you to convey our 
complaints to anyone who will hear us.  (SALAM, 23 Feb) 

   Caller:  Mutton is 600 tomans per kilo.  What are families who 
have not eaten meat for months supposed to do?  (SALAM, 28 Feb) 

   On the Operation of Hospitals 

   Caller:  On 14 February, Shari'ati Hospital cancelled all 
scheduled surgical operations because of the death of one of the 
physicians.  Unfortunately, this had disastrous effects.  Please 
send a reporter there immediately to see whether it is right to 
cancel all surgical operations because of one doctor's death. 
(SALAM, 19 Feb) 

   On the Economic Situation 

   Caller:  As an Iranian, I have a suggestion for improving our 
economic situation.  The government should stop, for 3-4 years, 
importing goods such as chocolate, cosmetics, crystals and varieties 
of expensive ball point pens, the shortage of which would make no 
difference to society.  The import of luxury items that have no 
other use except decorative ones should be stopped, and instead of 
spending foreign currency on these items, it should be spent on 
medications, sugar, cooking oils and the needs of the people. 
(SALAM, 21 Feb) 

   Caller:  In a country where there is a shortage of medication, 
and where the people have difficulty buying bread and meat, what is 
the reason for the excessive importation of the latest-model luxury 
cars, using dollars that should be spent on reconstruction?  (SALAM, 
28 Feb) 

   On the Single-Exchange Rate, Price of the Dollar 

   Caller:  In view of Dr. 'Adeli's statement last year that the 
single-exchange rate will force down the price of the dollar to 100 
tomans, I would like you to publish his address in the paper so that 
we can go and trouble him for some 100-toman dollars. 
   SALAM:  Go to The Central Bank, but you can be certain that he 
will not give it to you for less than 200 tomans.  And, we add that 
last year they used the price of the dollar at 100 tomans in the 
overall budget.  The previous economic minister was asked why they 
had estimated the dollar at 100 tomans while it was selling for 140 
tomans at the time.  He had said it was done to force the price 
down.  He was asked why then they had not estimated it at 50 tomans 
to force it even further down, if that was going to be the effect. 
You can see that the increase in prices and their fluctuations pay 
no heed to the officials' statements.  They continue to go up with 
no intention of coming down.  (SALAM, 23 Feb) 

   Caller:  Do something about the rising cost of the dollar because 
it has become a major problem.  It effects the price of everything 
and causes great difficulty for travelers wanting to go abroad. 
(SALAM, 24 Feb) 

   Caller:  I sold $2,000, transferred from abroad, in Eslambol 
(street where many of the moneychangers are located) on Monday for 
240 tomans.  After an hour, I bought it all back at 230 tomans.  I 
made 20,000 tomans, the equivalent of one month's salary.  I just 
wanted to say that the economic situation is great.  (SALAM, 28 Feb) 

   On Class Disparity 

   Caller:   In Wednesday's paper you wrote about class disparity in 
America.  Why are you talking about America and other countries? 
Why don't you say anything about your own country?  Isn't there 
disparity in our country?  Haven't some people amassed millions of 
tomans during these past 10 years?  Why isn't anyone investigating 
how they came into this money?  (SALAM, 23 Feb) 

   On Subsidies 

   Caller:  Every time I hear about subsidies, I am surprised. 
These gentlemen talk as if they have sold their private properties 
to provide subsidies to the people.  Please shed some light on this. 
Aren't subsidies paid for from the country's per capita income. 
What happens to the oil, the gas, the copper, the uranium and the 
iron that we have?  Don't they belong to the Iranian people?  Do we 
still give free oil to Syria?  (SALAM, 24 Feb) 

   On the Value of Iran Khodrow Stocks 

    Caller: Please write something about the Iran Khodrow 
(transportation) stocks.  Before the revolution, the stocks were 
bought and sold on the market for 600 to 700 tomans.  At that time, 
the price of a peykan (one of the cars assembled in Iran) was 38,000 
tomans.  After 15 years, considering that the price of a peykan is 
around 2,000,000 tomans, they have set the price of each share at 
340 tomans, while the prices of most other company stocks have 
increased.  This is unjust and inequitable toward previous 
stockholders who purchased these stocks with workers' salaries. 
Please do not let them violate people's rights.  (SALAM, 24 Feb) 

   On the Invitation extended to King Fahd 

    Caller: 1. In view of the words of Imam (Khomeyni), who said 
that we might be able to close our eyes on everything, but not on 
the killings of the Hajj pilgrims, then what is the meaning of the 
invitation extended to Fahd to come to Tehran? 
2.  What is the story behind erasing the slogans: "Death to Saddam" 
from the city walls because of the recent discussions between 
Iranian and Iraqi delegations?  This does not serve any purpose 
except to pain the martyrs' families.  As a member of a martyr 
family, I strongly object to this. 
   SALAM:  The feelings and the emotions of the distinguished 
martyrs' families not only should not be overlooked, but should also 
be respected and honored.  However, all those pains and afflictions 
are for the benefit and to the advantage of the Islamic countries, 
and the Muslim nation of Iran.  Then, at all times, the situation 
should be assessed and if the time comes that in order to safeguard 
those same interests and benefits, we should make peace with Iraq 
and normalize the situation, the conventions of the two countries 
should be observed, too.  Would it be appropriate for Iranians going 
on pilgrimage to Najaf and Karbela in Iraq, to face slogans against 
our country's officials?  (SALAM, 26 Feb) 

   On Advertisement of American Cigarettes 

   Caller:  What is the meaning of advertising American cigarettes 
on buses?  (SALAM, 28 Feb) 

   On Retirees 

   Caller:  Ask our officials what is the difference between the old 
retirees and the new ones that there are such differences in 
salaries?  Why should we be humiliated before our sons-in-law and 
our children?  (SALAM, 28 Feb) 

   On Political Parties 

   Caller:  I would like to ask the esteemed officials of the 
Interior Ministry to please list the names of the 76 political 
parties for which they have issued licenses, so that those who would 
want to can join them.  (SALAM, 28 Feb) 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN GULF/ 
SOUTH ASIA BRANCH AT (703) 733-6574) 
ENEAG/28 Apr/ECON/NEASA Division/ta 28/1744z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-57 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
PLEASE PASS TO STEVE FLEISCHMANN 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-28APR94-DPRK-U. S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      North Korea Invites IAEA for Refueling, Sues for U.S. Talks </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Korea Invites IAEA for Refueling, Sues for U.S. Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                 Continuing its strategy of minimal accommodation, Pyongyang has 
invited the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) to make 
limited observations of the refueling of the 5-megawatt reactor 
in Yongbyon.  At the same time, seeking to engage Washington in 
direct negotiations while circumventing Seoul on issues involving 
the security of the Korean peninsula, Pyongyang has proposed 
DPRK-U.S. talks on replacing the Armistice Agreement with a peace 
accord. 
                            END SUMMARY 

   In the first public acknowledgment of its invitation to the IAEA- 
- reported earlier in non-DPRK media (Yonhap, 21 April)--a 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement on 27 April declared that 
"technical requirements" are compelling Pyongyang to replace 
nuclear fuel "soon" at the Yongbyon "experimental power station" 
(Pyongyang radio, 27 April).  However, the spokesman made it 
clear that IAEA inspectors will be allowed only to "observe" the 
refueling process and to engage in related activities needed to 
"verify" non-diversion of the spent fuel.  Specifically, the 
spokesman said, the inspectors will not be allowed ''sampling and 
other inspection activities" that have apparently been requested 
by the agency.  He warned that if Washington and the IAEA 
Secretariat--the two entities the spokesman again accused of 
attempting to "crush" the DPRK--"rudely demand" such activities, 
which fall outside the province of ensuring "continuity of 
safeguards," it will lead to an unspecified "irrevocable complex 
situation."  Pressing for bilateral nuclear talks with 
Washington, the spokesman said that any additional activities 
could be discussed at future DPRK-U.S. talks. 
   Apparently as a further incentive for Washington to hold 
bilateral talks, the spokesman suggested that additional 
inspections requested by the IAEA following what the agency 
contended was an incomplete inspection of the reprocessing plant 
in March could also be accommodated   The spokesman said that 
Pyongyang is "studying" this question "in close relation to the 
attitude of the United States and the IAEA Secretariat." 
   Peace Accord     The spokesman's pitch for bilateral talks with 
Washington on the nuclear issue was followed by a North Korean 
proposal for an apparently separate set of DPRK-U.S. talks on the 
broad issue of security on the peninsula.  A 28 April Foreign 
Ministry statement--a vehicle a notch above a spokesman's 
statement in authority--formally proposed negotiations with 
Washington to seek a peace accord to replace the Armistice 
Agreement (Pyongyang radio, 28 April).  Clearly seeking to 
distinguish the new initiative from old--and long discredited- 
-proposals for a DPRK-U.S. peace treaty, the carefully worded 
proposal called for "a new arrangement of peace."  Uncompromising 
in tone, it went to great lengths to argue that the United States 
has in fact "completely destroyed and abandoned" the Armistice 
Agreement with a long history of violations, including 
introduction of prohibited new weapons in the South that 
culminated in the deployment of Patriot missiles.  The statement 
reiterated Pyongyang's objection to the naming of a South Korean 
general to head the UN side of the Military Armistice Commission 
(MAC), an act that the statement claimed had rendered the 
commission "a structure with no proprietor, a name with no 
substance." 

   Background     The new proposal seems to be a step backward from 
the North-South nonaggression pact of 1991.  In signing that 
accord, Pyongyang had agreed to treat the question of the 1953 
armistice accord as an inter-Korean issue, abandoning its long- 
held position that the issue of replacing the armistice accord 
with a peace treaty should be resolved between Pyongyang and 
Washington, because the South was not a signatory to the accord. 
As recently as 29 March, Pyongyang had repeated its claim of 
recent weeks that the South, by virtue of a series of 
"provocative" actions, including the deployment of Patriot 
missiles, has "unilaterally nullified" the 1991 inter-Korean 
agreement (KCNA). 
   Implications     The 27 April Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement is consistent with Pyongyang's persistent attempt to 
engage Washington in nuclear talks.  Pyongyang's transparent 
attempt to undermine the authority of the ROK government on the 
Armistice Agreement issue, as evident in the 28 Foreign Ministry 
statement, seems aimed--at least in part--at displaying contempt 
for the ROK government, which had recently yielded to the North 
and decided not to press for the exchange of special envoys.  It 
is not clear why Pyongyang chose to resuscitate a discredited 
proposal at this time, thereby risking the possibility of 
complicating nuclear negotiations. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTRIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/ta 28/1912z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-58 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000024994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-29APR94-China-India 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Denies Troop Build-Up On Indian Border </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Denies Troop Build-Up On Indian Border </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Beijing      has authoritatively denied Western news reports of large 
scale Chinese military deployments along the Sino-Indian border 
and portrayed recent talks with Indian officials on border issues 
as contributing to continued progress in resolving the sensitive 
border issue.  In response to a reporter's question at a 28 April 
news conference in Beijing, Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Wu 
Jianmin rejected as "sheer fabrication" reports that China had 
sent "30,000 troops" through Tibet to the Sino-Indian border 
(Xinhua, 28 April).  Consistent with Wu's denial, the Western 
press agency Agence France Presse quoted an Indian defense 
ministry spokesman on 25 April as dismissing reports from 
"Tibetan sources" that day of Chinese troop movements into Tibet 
and described the Indo-Tibetan border as "absolutely normal" 
(AFP, 25 April 1994). 
   Wu buttressed his denial of troop movements by noting that China 
and India had "begun talks on the reduction of troops" along the 
border in line with an accord signed last year by the two 
countries that established diplomatic and military expert teams 
from the two sides to negotiate a solution to the longstanding 
border problem (Xinhua 28, April).  Both Chinese and Indian media 
commentary on the recently concluded second round of talks 
between the teams suggests that both sides view the 21-23 April 
meetings as having made progress on some issues.  Reflecting this 
apparent progress, a 23 April Xinhua report stated that the two 
sides signed regulations guiding the work of the teams.  The 
report also implied that progress had been made when, in contrast 
to Xinhua's portrayal of the first round of expert talks in 
February, it made no mention of military tension on the border 
and said that the two sides had discussed ways of "continuing" to 
implement the border accord.  In February, Xinhua had said that 
the teams had exchanged views on solving, "as early as possible," 
the issue of "close military confrontation at certain sectors" of 
the border, and had discussed "future tasks in implementing" the 
agreement. 
   Indian media were even more upbeat in assessing the results of 
the talks.  A 25 April report carried by the ISI Diplomatic 
Information Service not only repeated Xinhua's evaluation of the 
talks but also went on to claim that both sides had expressed 
satisfaction at "the confidence building measures already in 
place" and that the line of actual control along the Sino-Indian 
border was "peaceful."  The atmosphere of the talks, it said, was 
"friendly" and the two teams had "adopted a constructive and 
forward-looking approach." 
   (AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 29/2235x Apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

